      "identifier" : [
         "8_06877_314"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "PAGES MISSING",
         "* t-- \u002b \u0026 t- Puouuum im orai. 0 ftimai nmn àoo- 1 êi. i IJ--0 NTKEN J*V$ k.dtOl SJ... .... .~.. ..................... .... ..t $I ........ iwb6It ,Wa ud Whe................. of - I u e Sbol Nature$St*dy.Of AiiakI... ; Bible Ra teÏ- 0\"à 1 rrcggla Verb G,..-.......~ Curit ES\u0026............ ;'~' BcOI BoN qM Au\" ----------t t4 aw the. ie l.1À- of! J - t. f t -----N",
         "r EDUCATIONAL REVIEW 12ô6 USEFUL BOOKS. CHILD TRMINING.-A systemn of education for the child under scbool age, by V. M. Hillyer, head master of Catvert school, New York. T7he Cenitury Comiparw, 1915; $1.60 net Here is a book that we should like to put into the hands of every pimary teacher, and of every mother who la attempting to get her young children into good habits. Intended more espec- ially for the guidance of mothers and untrained teachers, it is f ull of valuable suggestions for every one who has much to do with children. For the primary school particularly, it furnishes plans for work and play -that will bighten many a school day, and prepare the child to take full advantage of later opportunities. The book contains no new or untried theories. It 16 practical, definite in its instructions, illus- trates freely, and has the confident tone that comes of successful experience. The writIE;s aïm, he tells us, is to produce \"children who will be more observant and attentive, with more on.i nality and initiative and sharper wits; who will _think and act more quietly, be betten informed and 4\u002bre accornplished, more skilful with their handa, more courteous and considerate àf others.\" These qualities ami habits sisouki moi be iscidenta4 in education; ths Ioud be acquired by direct drill. Tihis is tihe uwk tisai sisould bc do\"e. The italicised words, though flot word for Word quotation, express the distinctive contention of the author. By far the greater portion of' the book~ is -given to showing the practical application of the principle that qualities are to be developed and habits acquired by drill. Geneçal inatruc- tionà take'up about eighteen pages., Tlese deal wldth the routine and'method of training, the question of puuishments and'reWards, and. the acquisition of speed and concentration. Then àoiw number of programmes, adapted for both home and sehool work, for the individual child, and' for amali or large classes. Part'Il. wiIl be most, interesting to the prinm- ary teaicher, containing, as' it does, details of habit drill#. The firat drill is for obedience, firaÈt to' the. simplet onders, sometimes to be obeyed by imitagtion of the teacher. Terms of direction are taughi. Then come drills, to teach obedience and .attention. 'The ordens are given quietly anid ,not repeated. Deferred ondens drill for obedience, attention, and memory. A. Iist of orders is read; e. g., John, shut the door. Mary, openthe book. Harry, walk to the desk, Jane, pick up the pencil. After the list la read, each child is expected to obey hia or her own order, without asking to, have it repeated. Negative orders involve training in another habit. The order is given, \"Don't look round,\"' and the teacher makçs noises behind the children to test their power of self-control. In connc- tion with this, Mr. Hillyer, notes that teachers are often told \"Don't say don't\", \"but inhibition - which is the ' suppression of desire to do the forbidden ithing -is an important habit to be cultivated, and though it la perfectly true, that the unfamiliar, -the unlikely to happen, is as a rule-, best left unmentioned, nevertheless, for purposes of discipline, practice lu obeying neg- ative commande is highly important, as most laws, from the Decalogue down, are prohibitions, \"Thou shaliflot.\" Another dri la on oW~ienoe to orders involv- iqg judgment; e. g., \"Close the window.\" The child muet flot asIc which wi dow to dlose, but muet . think for himself which wiudow la letting in ramn or a cold wind. \" Bring me my hatt\" The child ùuat flot say \" Where la it?\" but find i1V; and so on'. Other drills are on carrying messages, on order and neatness, observation, association and imagination. Part 111. la devoted to atory telling. On this subject- the writer has, aound and decided viewa. Among the kinds of atories to be told to children lie ennumerates: 1. Hero atonies, and t hom that deal with courage, truth and other virtues; these instil ideals. 2. Fauciful tales, for stimu- lating imaginations and giving a delight ln the- world.- 3. Humorous and nonsense atonies, for, helping the child to get fun out of 111e, and gîvisng him an antidote againat dreary over-seniousuess Among stories to, be avoided he inclucles tales that make wrong attractive, and tales ,of bogies and hor:ors. He warn8 us that commonsens (we would auggeat also, a sense of humou~r) is necessary in purgating stonies, aund tells of a mother who olected to the nursery rhyme of \"Three Blind Mice,\" ou the ground that ïý taught cruelty to, animale. [A more ertrme CamP ia that of the~ childrn whose nurse was Widq tQ say to them \" Pussy Cat, Puss, Cat, w1IPrP have you been?\" becàu8e it euded wi thetilin about a little mouse being frlght\"p4. , Mt-",
         "Hillyer i.strongly omIwttpo tpd\" ôd' to cw coavey.,in formation. d\"I oe$ oto tpi .,hIe 14 sa ys, are b'Ad from ever poi0tofV\"o. Pt about wture amre tter tut,i n~ t\u003c . I Information' £pol. e a tMy, =a suMôr informatios. Othertopice, 4du it Iamt rhythmic àat = nimwusifril --P ifoematio\u003ctan ad the bqi * writiàg; asid ail1 are treated in \u003c*0 suite VM and deffixite way. We oaS ' heard the head aiIstrtss-of a Engla fho a btox q s . wlwp it made lîtth iedffemS to ti.iaek ie, 4wh1~ chilcren vereU.1 raipM, ,pgr -ot; y1po. ece it dùtnak\" ah. w q4 1himq and a l1~hw ~ Mr. Hilyçr aimes in hj me produce otol u;S be with,ada ddit tq.r4# eqaUo.lly \u003c4W coÙdet that t\u0026uejv *0,ret spleaffwet 14, ï, f9umdatli for IU* in.C qa. I Pu4me adiain *Utàtm' 1.hSoMé *motatoÏi i-.",
         "208 EDtTCATIONAL REVIEW. CHILDREN AND THE WAR. Just how shall'we take up the discussion of the present great world war with the children of..the lower grades? This is the probiem that confronts the primary teacher to-day. Well we 4now that the subject must be discussed, for the littie ones are just as interested in the war news as their eiders. Like their eiders, they have gathered miscellaneous items bearing on the subject f romn various sources, reliable and otherwise, and are burning with the desire to communicate said items to their scbool- mates, and, particularly to the long-suffering teacher. Our neighbors to-the south, in some localities at least, have decided that the subject may weli be ignored in school, as savoring of militarism. We caxinot agree with them. On the contrary, every teacher must see that bhrMiÎs the opportunity of a life-time, no matter how depiorable the tacts Ieading up to the event, to show children just how history is made and how the outcome of great wars influences the map of the world. Even ýthe smaller children are 'getting a better idea of the map of Europe. to-day than they would N ordinarily obtain in years of study,. Apropos of this , a pupil in grade IV, not a brilliant one by any means, iu fact quite the contrary, after poring over \"Highroads of History\" for somne time, raised bis baud and announced, \" The Battie of Waterloo was fought in Belgium too.\" That one fact gleaned for himseif meant more to him than dozens of parrot-learned- sentences, and he had found it out because Belgium to-day is to him more than merely a namne. Such phrases as \"neutral nation,\" \"war zone,\", \"contraband of war,\" \"mobilizing,\" etc., are Iecoming more than empty phrases. They convey definite ideas, and can be used intelligently by these same children'. As to the'relation of colonies to the Motherland, surely no generation of school children ever had a better opportunity to see a practical illustration of thiat rclationship and its value, than the children of the British Empire to-day! To go back then to the beginning: It will be wise to set asicle a part of our \"morning talk\" period to the discussion of the war. (The wisdom of -thi8 course à seen after one bas been electrified i the midst of a. spelling lesson by some startling item o)f nôws anent the Germans). At the very outsct, the eidren should be given a clear and concise accouint of why The Empire is at war. The late Lord Roberts bas put it very simfply for them in his message, \"Cbildren of the Empire: Why are we fighting? Because the British Empire does flot break its promise nor will it allow amali nations to be bullied.\" Let the chiidren see that we are flot blindly upboiding tbe Empire in any course, bad or good, but that Britain took the only honorable. coprse open to her, and it is for just this nice sense of national honor that ber colonies love and respect ber to-day./ As to the items of war news related by the child- ren, let us pass as lightiy as possible over the horrors of the war, and this is the part they will love to magnify and want to -dwell upon, let us discourage the spirit of flippancy and braggadocio and any- thing savoring of hatred of the German nation as a whole.1 Let the children understand that it is 4he spfit of militarismn in the Germans which we deprecate and are endeavoring to combat, and nlot any personal batred to the German soldie\u0026s themselves, many of whom are figbting with the same spirit of patriotismn as that which actuates our own soldiers. Valor and patriotism we expect in the Brit\"s soidier and we cannot help emphasizing these as ,ational characteristics, but let. us, by simple anecdotes of the war try to emphasize also somne other qualities wbich our boys in- khaki are displaying every day :-unfaiiing good nature under petty discomforts; the unselfishness wbich forges personal danger in- heiping others, and which. puts honor before expediency; chivairy to women and children and, humane and brotherly treat- ment of a foe,-all these may well find ample illustration in stories of the war.1 Help the cbildren to become acquaInted with the leaders in this great struggle:-.the .stroig silent Kitchener, AdmiraI Jellicoe, General French, Geferal Joffre and the heads of thé waring, na ions. Bring to their notioe the work of the: Red Cross and Purple Cross Societies. Read to them the best -of the poemsa on the war, Kipling's \"Hymn Before Action,\" -aud bhie tribute to Lord Roberts, Show them, why Lord, Roberts was great and -how this tie t-8tI up the man. 208",
         "E£)UÇATIONALI £EVmWel Whqm -ahe- n Kiplings kebedouaI m Id$ eh be tàlked- over in t6is- *io \"Go ofoprFathM\" unote. Io M'ay. to a oertwn ecjt*em#t the wor by. ghg totheyI~t an\u0026 hesthy o6utlook on tlW n14. 'w. The'.*riter of tht. -artkfe, f6 acquiting the aYt C Of ,ý-- o -Mauy of tI*e, cbâdn4t «*, the aounds ô4Çtbe wOn* whoms the 41eèt W bW ,or 9 oie of thiê têm*-~ this word » \" and peoWpi individu*1»Y UidcOUctdN*Y. SpaMme,~ cfit",
         "210 EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. Then words of more complex foundation sounds werç introduced as: -ick w- ick st-ick br-ick. t-ick \u0026-ick sl-ick qu-ick. D-ick l-ick th-ick cl-ick. p-ick r-ick ch-ick fl-ick. and -ing r-ing hr-ing. d-ing k-ing Str-ing. s-ing w-ing sw-ing. th-ing sl-ing. Then followed groups of words having the long vowel- sounds, the éffect of the final e, being noted thus -1 -ake b-ake 1-ake m-ake r-ake s-ake t-ake w-ake fi-ake. sh-ake, sn-ake. st-ake. yand .in 1-mne v-ie. d-ine n-mne, wh-ine. k-sne p-ie -tw-ine. w-ine -ap-ine ah-mne. Groupe were developéd also from the sounds, '-ate, -ite, --ight, -ill, --ell, -ink, -ay, -ogld, -ood, --Sk, -etc. These spelling drills were carried on for about ten minutes each day, and altogether apart from lie regu6r readipg and spelling -lessons. ferliops sanie new word introduoed i the day1à eà imýlesoit would furnish the base for î\"whoe gSeup. of words. Fo6r, instance the -ick family grew out of the sentence \"May 1 pick you?\" pick being a new- word to the lass. Similarly, the word \"lbest\" U4 She flme you best of alI the flowers,\" suggesed - est n--est w-est. b-est p-est ch-est. -str--est qu--est. Due advantage -of tis method of word drill isa that 'a teaclier needs no Normal College training iIn order to carry it out successfully, andayun teacher with little or no knowledge 10f pionetice may ope great improvement in ber clases throug ita -use. Notwithâta»4ing ail said to the contrary, the ~.r» g re4t ajei f. words have a strong suggestion Of thef speliing i their pronunciation, and con- t,' *ued word 4rdIs enthusiasticaily carried on, will work ýwoide with ihe most inpromising çlasees. HINTS FOR MARCH AND APRIL. With the spring montbs cornes restiesanes. -Wben that Aprille'with his schowre swaoote 'The drought of March bath perced to the romt. Then longen folk to gon on piigrimaffl.\" So wrote Chaucer five hundred years ago, and it is stili true. When the brooks begin to run and we get the smell of earth, we want to do andi sce something different. In the schoolroom this spring feeling shows itself in fiçigets and slackness about work. And yet it is just at this lime that the teacher begins to realize how much has yet to, be done, how littde lime of the school year remains, and that every minute muet be made to count. Do not repress the fidgets too sternly, but try to give the restlessness a vent in frequent marches and simple physical exercises,' wlth, plenty of fresh air in the room- anad give what relief from monotony you can without neglectin regular work. A very littie' variety mneans a great deal to a child . A change of seat, a re- arrangement of the tinie-table, a new plaut or picture in the room,- changes in the openiag exerciees, in the order or manner of dismiuaL, or of forming classes, or going to àêta - azny of these, may add a little interest and freslines. We have. been- j» schoolrooms where the Christ. mas decorations were stili place in June, and where the. same drawings or stencilinge stay.d on the board the year round, betokening a lack of interest on the part of the teacher. Have' somde pleasant, little change in the room to greet the children after the Easter holidays, if not before. Reviews of the work done through the wi2ter may be made interesting by différent devicp. Some suggestions for reviewing history bisons are given in another column. Where a dais is weak at somne particular point in arithmetic., spelling or graminar, for instance, ianit-or adopt some -stimulating little competitiçn, ae4 offer a trifling reward,. such as haif an.-hou?. story-reading, a new -game taught at reoess, or dismissal of the class a, few minutes earl3er, Colds are so common in spring that a mornuag talk might be given on their preventlin 4*d cure, and on good manners inceiciOiW1 coughing, sneezing and use \"of 'a po4*t b1\"0,- 210",
         "E B~UCAT~~NM~ kerchif. Chil*es siwrmYà.leWi h.avy wï4ter datbingts.wd\" sdeIo $4t ysgl: TIti ApdV.dnd s 4«4 ~ grses ier, é0 a -« in bi0l ily 1 %4dzoo\".W',smi sotd aecofred l twb W Iategatçê; 2pit. To=piom ?dt Whlch May~ wa Ami y4heyd inm Whe. .4. It dg\"-pe: Si",
         "212 ED.UCATIONAL REVIEW. middle. Montenegro 's is the saine with a crowi in the blue stripe. The flag of Japan that w see here is the merchant flag, a red disc in th centre of a white field. The japanese nave flag aàds red rays to the disc. Hains Christian Andersen was born on Apr 2nd, 1805. \"The Ugly Duckling\" and th Proud Apple Tree,\" The Tin Soldier\" are son of the many of his charming stories that ai suitable for this trne. William Wordsworth's birthday'is April 7t? He may be introduced to the children, throug his poem, \"March.\" The cock is coy'ng, The stream is flwing, The unall birds twitter, The lake doth glitter, sn The green field sleeps in the an The oldest and youugest Are at work with the. strongest; The cattie are grazmng, Their heada neyer ramsng; There are forty feeding like one. Lilce an army defeated The saow hath retreated, Aunow doth fart M. On the top.of the bore hWt Tii ploughboy is whooping - anon - anon. -Theres joy *u the mountains, TheWs e's inf.luthe.fountains, Sinan ak\"d arem aâili Mu,*y Prçvailing; Thé rain ij over and gone.- We caii hardly imagine a more welcor addition to the waill decorations of a scho ropm juat -now, than a copy of the \" Daily M; Rage of the -Wrld.\" This is a charte 40 x inches in size, printed in full colours, showi the flage of ail nations. More than sixty badi Of \"ThMe Briton Over-Seas\" alone'are includt Put it * flot aaf-tg chart only, for it bas pictui and d'iagrains of different types of naval cra ï0cluding torpedo boats, submarines, both Briti and foregn, -drawings of -various foripa of artillh aàd4. perhaps ms interesting of aIl, types àir craft, ihowing the -Zeppelin, taube and othe Flght pae 0cf explanatory notes accompany t charte, giving up-to-date information on tht sublecta. ~.,'The diart, is fasteued into a folder, but cot iasly be detaclaed and mounted, or it may obta*d mouated on cloth with r ollers. PdCSI _ 1tne.,WIU \u003eimr. U3e t. QrUt 1% rn e ie al 'il 'e HISTORY REVIEWS. B. C. 55.- A. D. 1216. L. Give the dates of the kings frorn William I to John. Learn: First, William .the Norman, theii, William, his son, Henry, Stepheri and Henry, then Richard and John. ie 2. Between the first and eleventh centuries; repeople of what different nat ioIs, came to the country that we now caîl England? Prom what Khdifferent countries dýO they corne? 3. Write f rom two to five, lines about each of the following: J ulius Caesar, Caractacus, Boadicea, Columba, Dunstan'- Godwin, Hereward the Wake, Lanfranc, Prince. Arthur, Stephen Langton. In writing a little paragraph, like this about a. famous person, tell (a) what their postiot(\"or profession was, e. g., a queen, a priest, a general; (b) their nationality; (t) when they lived. If you do net know the dates of the lives, tell, the century, the reign, or name smre eventa that took place while they were living, c. g., at the Urne the Danes were invading England; (d) the- impbprtant thing of ail is to tell what they did that makes theni interesting or worthy of reinembrance. 4. What is a treaty? What facts about a treaty is it important to know? The people who made it, the war, or dispute that wus ended by it, the'date, and what was agree4 to' ne by it. o1- State these facts about the Treaty of Wcd' [ail more' (A. D. 878): 30 5. King Alfred said: \" This 1 can now uiSt ing truly say, that I have desired to live worthily eswhile I- lived, and after my life to leave to the ed. men that should live after me 'a remembrance ýres, of good will.' And it was said of hlm, \"Thee ft, is no king we know of wiser, worthier, or hsore ish profitable te bis people.\"- Show. from 'your ery history that'king Alfred was \"1profitablè to'hie of people.\" Was his',desire fulfilied? rs. 6. Where are the following places, and. why. the are they mentioned in your history? Ioxqa, ese, Canterbury, Rouen, Westminster, Ely, Jerusa' lem, Anjou. uld 7. Name the Danishkings of Engtand ýand, be tell in what century they reigned. 8. What was the beginning ofIiGr* ilpjury of to-day'? J 212",
         "m t; papera Lvt ML Impbrtaa\u003c 4Mw Ip *Wý Boo, 1-6\u003c WZ 83NeV diw '12 tht *hu dea $wqmp",
         "21j EDUCATIONAL REVIEW\". TEACHING TER WAR. J. Viocu. An article'in School and Soci et y under the above heading shows the interest taken in the sùbject among teachers ini the United States. In some cities, it appears, they spend from ten to tbirty minutes- daily teaching the war in the high school grades, though from twenty minutes, to an hiour a week is more common; One extremist thinks that thefr schools should teach nothing else until the war is over; while others are opposed to it, the school authoritdes in at Ieast two cities forbidding ail allusion to it, and eéven droppig ail lessons in European gramphy and history for the time. We need nc4 pgnrue the arguments for and against .ecigtewar in the echools .of a ,ieutral cotrntry. He there should be a much deepériterst lM its events, and stronger tessons for- following th.m day by dy or week by .woek in the. siotom. It 18 our war. Our children are axùd slould b. intensey interest- ed' uin ts origini, its, progreos, and. its possible reSulis.Our problèms am not. whether to tea4i* liesubleet or ibtot temac it, but how to aporoach d dhw uhtm to give to it. *itiviftbe fact that it viii net count directly in tht rewiuto ofour fnleai atin.Every teeacler (W supeitendent whp has the. responsib- ilIty, of atimie-table muet ma\"v.these SomNe tçachýr*, reserve their niost interesting \u003c ct for FMay aftermSoon when the regular taskm of the week have wearied the pupils, adthe flgng attention needs to be revived. To thèe the- war viii furpis topics of most .bo~ligIztr \u003et and some part of that seasmon. might velibedevoted to oumming Up the vit, ova-eeà( For this purpose, it is ou gwthat thor be a division of the clame, ohSection chsge with one division, of the su\u003ejiet it might b. with one territorial division -thé var zone. One leader, .or'g ufor, UoUm4oi, megt gi* :sPecial attention to tihe pe*ulb qpaphy of Plaiders; know.some- *h~pgotae, people, their history and their industîries; Iearn wbat troope are khere engaged; 40110W- their mýo eate't9; collect and care for, *4e iun,14 m,4 P Ms needed; look ,up the. fproper naMes; and4learr as ~a io~I~ô!thje significancé of events in that region. Another group, perhape, would take 'the bigblands to the Eastward, and the. valley of the Meuse; another, East Prussia. and Russian Poland; another, Galicia, the Carpath. iane and the plIains of Hungary; another, the. Balkans and the. shores of the Adriatic; another, Constantinople and its surroundings; another, the. North Sea and English Channel. The information obtained by each section Would be discussed before the whole clams; and it would remain for the teacher, or for the.clams sea whole, to determine each week which brought material of the' greatestvau and described events of the greatest importance. At other times in the week, the teacherwould find occasion for lessoe on the general situation; why Germany, Austria and Russia feel shut ini, wbat they vant, what other interests are ckppobe to th isthe story o! Constaninope, thé sry of tb.rpartition of Poland, of the tise of the. Russian Empire -or of, the German Emp*ire, of other events in the. history of Eur*~e thnt bear upon the. causes and theii.iues o! the. war; lessns on the radia! probîtans, 'on the forms c goverament and the conditioma of the peoplek W the. différent countries, on the 4a1ue of railways sud canais in, war'and in commerce, on the effects of the, var upon trade snd iOdustry ,in the belligerent countries sud elSewhere. This is by no means ah exhaustive list. Tiiere art other topics vhich corne within the opah- sion of high school pupils, and can 'be lewsiy brought vwithin the. range of their awakened. interest at thus time, to their permanent advan-ý taget Perhaps the. first thing vhiph muetdus ueed to learu is that we are flot calledilpon to hate and vilify the. Germnans; but to *fiit thin, and to protect ourselves aud our alliéeand the emaller neutral nations froni German domintion. The. larger 'neutral nations, if they wisii to keep out of the struggle now, may protect themelvus biter, if Germauy should vin now for vaut .Of their help to oppose lier. Most Germans firmly believe that -the Gëxmaiu race and- character, Germian liws, and4 Gexniu organization and efficiency, a re 'èuperwor io a* - other. Though they hate us as their gseatest. rivaIs, we can hardly, blame t)Wm %4\u003c* to extend wbat they consider 'the blhWagp « German rule. If we stili prefer our cY*Va 214",
         "41: fe f tt eti baid w tor vty",
         "216 EDUCATIONAL REV1EW. NATURE STUDY 0F ANIMALS. H. G. PFiRY. Covermngs 'of Animais. Compare the naturai coverings of man, ape, horse, cow, sheep, pig, dog, cat, rabbit, porcu- pine, mink, hen, turkey, turtie, snake, frog, fish, lobster, grasshopper, and e arthworm. Add other animais to this list, and name those coeed with hair, fur, wool,, feathers, o cls 0f what use is the body èovering to animais? N Note howv it varies fromn season to season,, in 'Idifférent animais, and% its generai adaptation to the life conditions of each. At what time, or times, of year do animais change their coverings? Name the process in different animais. Why is a change of covering neoessary? What is the differençe between hair, fur and wool? To what use is each put ini the indus- trial arts? What is leather? What is the annual value of the fur and wooi1 produoed in Canada? Name -our fur-bearing animali, and show how the story of the fur-trade is connected with the history of Canada. What parts'of Canada. are especially adapted for the production of wooi? Name the. chief breeds of dheep raise in Canada, and indicate thec best wool produoers. How is the wooi got from fthe sheep? What are vertebrate animais? Name those in our ist,- the'othens may be classified as inverte- brates. Vertebrata is the phylum or group- naine of vertebrate animais, and is made up of several classes, mammalia being the highest, Define the, çlass maznmaiia, aLnd name the mammai in our 'Bat., This 18 the, only ciass of animais in which we find a covering of hair, fur, or wobl. Do they ever have any other kind of covering? Birds belong. to the ciass aves, and are pro- vided with feathers. Examine a ýpigeon or fowi for their arrangement, and note that the whoke*body is flot covered, but that they are ~ ~. distributed ini unes and patches, calied feather. tracts. 1 How meny kcinds of feathers do you find on bird»?, (See EDUCA4TIONAL RFv ie w, Decmbe, 11~,page 133). Note the use of uch. What is -die~ speciai advantage of feathers ~a co erIg?- -Compar* the plumage of maie and female bit4is,*Mo ofM y'oug ýanctmature birds., . 0 216 What part of- the bird is flot covered with feathers? The scales of the feet' suggest a relationship to reptiles. Snakçs, lizards, turtlçs,, etc., belong to the class reptilia. Note the covering of these animais as a class. Why does the snake shed its skin,, and iiow often? What is 'the covering of frogs and tcads? These animnais, with newts and salamanders, are common representatives of the ciass amphi- bia. Contrast their covering with that of reptiles, and expiain how to distînguish a lizard, f roma newt or saIgmander. Pisces or fishes is the Iast and iowçst class of vertebrates. How are the scales of fish ar- ranged? Note their difference in size and color on different parts of the body. The colors are chiefly due to pigments within special dermal oeils, called chromatophores. Examine scaes with a hand lens, and note the star-shaped pigment spots. The simple pigments are either red, orange, yeliow or black, but other, colors are produced by a combination of chromatophores; Ir example, \\yeliow and black give brown .N4te that colons are'usuali'y arranged on fish in longitudinal or -transverse stripes.\u003e How are the fins coiored? On which part of. the body are the lighter colors?, How do they compare with land antimais in this particular? Fish aiso change in color with.achange in the color of their surroundings, and most b:ioys have noticed some differénoe in the color of trout from different streams, ýand at times f rom differenit parts of thé saine stream. Frogs are ais\u003c, subject to sinilar changes, but the best example of ail is the littie chanmeleon, which varies its color almost instantly with a change in the color of its surrbundings. These animais are said to enjoy a higli degree of protective coloration. Do other animais have protective coloring? 1s it more pronoivnced in domnestic or wild animais? Study animais in their haunts, and note how, different colors and different. combinations of colors, serve as protection coloration for different1 animas:- the toad in the garden, the frog, by, the pool, the partridge on the grond, the rabbit in the woods, etc., etc. How ,h\"as it happened that we find each animaI l'ohed. ni colors best suited to its need? Are the oevex- ings of animais in generai equaily wel ýdaptd4",
         "ancl othr inv.tbmte. 9f the. Iobtw'. 0md akeleton, and bein,ùaQl is. caled au -epêk' skeleton, vwith theitetm 'How do SraWMIpp*iI4 coat , aMd how Ofiehê obvefng feeSmqt\u003eê'., cgetWer couiugs 130wTO DRAW*A uré,e' a ivep mted t from moe î4ç,ô the, Unes , runeôw anid number, te0ie 1I for coeieee I 1' MIÇATIO -AL.",
         "VÎF l \" EDUCATIONAI. REVIEW. 218 MARCH. The storrny March has corne at la With wind and cloud and chang 1 hear the rushing of the blast That through the storrny valley Ahi paaumng few are they who spea Wild storrny month, in pi-aise of Yet, though thy wids are loud au Thou art a welcorne month to ai T hensing aloud the gushing râls, And the fuil springs, lfrom fi-ast That, brightly Ieaping down the hi Are just set out to meet'the oea. Tht vind l bovethe sun shinesthe birds où Thet% bubie sky as feked with fleecy, da Over erth'a rejoicng fields the châùden dan AMi the frop pape ini chorus, \"ti pig The pais «uethe foyier Iaughe where M11W, Ve~r the bremy hiUtop hoaruely cafls the crow By. the flowing river, the aider catkins swiq And thetvuwet on-upsr aies, 4\"Spdingi Wbkhevir way the, viai doth blow, soi» hum le'sdto have it au, Se bw it sà,'oeblow # wveut lme- vieil that 1\u003eIowsthat wvi s lb lii* wmo~. EOLUS AND TH-IF BAG 0F WINDS. eEolus (eé-olus.), the-icing of the wind s, liveci îng ski\",n rocky isiand that floated about in the ooean flies. When Ulysses, the wise Greek, was sailing home with al bis ships and men from the siege of ikTroy, be came to this island and landed. He 1 thee, and bis men were very kindly treated by dEolus id bleak, and they stayed theoe a month. nel When they were ready to go, AEolus gave Ulysses a leather bag tied tightly with a silver Set fi-ee, string. In this bag were ail the unfavourable ID., -winds, shut up 80 they could flot blow, and -Bryant. AElus commanded the fair winds to blow the ships of Ulysse to their own country. For nine days the fair, winds blew and the shipe mg loud, flew steadily towards home, and ail that time Lppled cloud, Ulysses stooci at 'the helm and steered. At ice and sang It 1ping! length he was quite tired out and lay doivn to sleep. Then his meni began to wonder what wua lately Iay thé in the mysterious bag. They thought it muest hold some treasures, 80 they untied the silver - string, and roaring and raging, ail the foui wînds i t as Spring!'? burst out. They tossed the shipe and drove Cuia Thaxwe. them far from their, course and at last'brought them back to the island. AEolus was so angry at the fooliahness of the- men, that he would help them no miore, and they had to toil hard at their oars on the rest OSt. of their journey. BIBLE R11ADINGS FOR OPENIG EXERCISES \"5*91 fie thte kuiiié snows undimrned *and white, And rdI5fsthevw=ttWe pregmaut silence, still N~oa éIg of sprl\u0026 ag, etbat the catkins fil, Ami wilo t*u*sgrow daily i-ciland 1ight.\" - Heln Hunst Jackson. The b1ueledscant fi-rn the elr's long branches, Ahy=nato wuçek the buddin year, me souil vI%àaderp fror f ield'to foi-est, And uofty wbiqoeâ, \"The Spring is here.\" -WilJi C. Bryant. Croc\"s. Wuoen# Wid csr i o pri T to mo siaok of earth; FuqUag and facéyý fondly RMn Roundfi ýta w\"ichove thear bir.ti Te dmes, sa\" t twh\"mle spot Wàm dmweuo Ib\" *Md thy lowly lot. Exodus, i. Exodus, i. 3. Exodus,i 4. Exodus,i 5. Exodus,i 6., Exodus, 7. Exodus, 8. Exodui, 9. Exodus, 10. Exodus,i 11. Exodus,, 12. Exodus,. 13. Exodus, M. Exodus, 15. Exodus, 16. Exodus, 17. Exodus, 18. Exodus, 19. Exodus, 20. Exodus, 6-14. 22 - Exodus ii. 4-10. iv. V. vi. vu. ix., xi. X. X. xiii. iv xlv, 23-25 - Exodus iii. 1-6. 7, 10, 11, 12,.16, 18. 1-9, 27-31. 1-9, 22, 23. 6-18. 20-32. 13-15, 18-26. 27-35. 7-15. 16-27. 1-3, 5, 8, 11-14. 21-28. 29-M6. 37-42.1 20-22 - Exodus xiv. 19 13-22. 23-31. 21. St. Luke, xxiv. 1-9. 92.\u003e St. John, xx. 1-10. J- 9-12.",
         "c s h. %~ItEATI0KAV Vi 1Tl Once upcî ztin, tis wjshed t bp a 4oUl. hit of two babygirl\u0026swhcasi Mary Anna. \u003eay dnreri the litS. était tesphu sintht to tins, and ji mondng unUl night. 'Th dresm tint s?à could be discovend thnt almost sur a d0li ras aom.tkess pÎilwWoe, ors a,_, iffo:- ielnowthe bal~p dàubc ai u#h hpy wo mdoe her' At W-tI nt M*iedi hes\" pfltj \u003cIL t~t k 4, t w 0 .tt a~ Att t J t 4. - A 4 1' ~t t --k,-.",
         "- -~-~'~ §~ -a Z.~ ~ n EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. IRRGULAR VBRB GAME. While the children watch, the teacherperforms some action as ringing abell, ,sitting down, etc. Pupils then do other things and each tells what he bas done, as \"I jumped after Miss Càrston rang the bell.\" \"You see,\" the teacherý commented, \"before this gaine is finished, the children have said, 'Miss C. rang' enough turnes to. reaily begin to make an impression. The beautiful thing about ià ail is the faut that they say it over and over again without' being conscious of the fact that they are made the victims of a good, stiff drill, because it is ail done in a gaine and they are 90 busy playing. In my roem, we play that smre lttie gaine, ail through the year, by simply working in a littie variety i conducting it. The little people neyer tire of it because it gives vent ta theirinbomn love of motor activty. Besides that, every teacher knows that children fairiy dote on repetition and neyer fail ta appreciate the- pleasure of chooeing for themselves. My boys and girls are as free as air. 1 have even stood by unabashed while they, shut ail of the windows on a stifling hot day, or turned an élaborate round of somersaults. 0f course when 1i 4W' My. slare ini Startini the bal rolling, I alwaya.taire cazto) choose a past-tense that bas prowed ta, be, as, the boysý terni it, 'a poser.\"'9 \"MOW do yoru varytýhe gaine?\" \"After we have, had., several - weeks of the siplest fdnii, \u003c,tIlig for the statejnent of the tegcher's acioxý. and the one more of the child's »\"w, the teacher again sets the new pace, by .,-perIàrmîùng »everal different actions, while fhei pupils watch' carefuliy as before. These tliing are al done in the ridst of a- perfect silenoe. I an, always slow and deliberate in my movements, but I do not allow any tinie to eliae between the different things I do. When ail is finisbed - 1 usually begin with three different acta --- :a child ises and tackdes the sti it of verb-formi»g that 1 have taken pains tpaoebefore,,himn.He begins,'i saw Mis Caston begi j our. garne. She, rang the bél,; blew the 'horn,'mod then sat down??' I insis tha t eiàtrodltory 'i saw' neyet be omitted althw giison:gedm. thie, statlémentt is shçrtenýed ~i\u003e ~ ~pIe ~tezwnt'Isa-MissCarston,'- and lef t at that. That.invariable recurrenoe of 'saYw' is as powerful as a Gatling gun and by the time this particular form of our gaine, bas ýeached the lirnit of its usefuiness, 'I mee' bas Ssince been relegated to the dim and forgotten palt Later on in the school year,' when the, children have completely forgotten their earlier timidity and have learned to take the initiative, they are ready for the last forin of my gaine, and here we achieve correct English with a speed that is fast andi furious.\"I \"This form, the \u003emost comfplex of ail, ie a combination of language dziîll and practice in sense work. It is based upon that well-known littie 'sulent gaine\"' ini which one chiid'touches one thing, another child the saine thing and another one, etc. In adapting the device for use in our verb-form drill, -we, of course, make use of as many different fortm e of action as we possibly can. In the beginning, we take the device -and' use it just as we did in our se se training work -'that is-Johnny touches a picture, Susie touches the picture and then throws a bail, Mary touches the picture, throws the bal 1a nd blows' out a lighted candie. At the end of Mary's activities, Mary or any one of the three participants in the gaine, or evensaine chiid who bas been watching very cloeely, is asked to tell what was glqpe. He or-she rimes to say, .'John touched the picture, Susie threw the bail, and Mary--biew out the iight.' If al of.the past formes of the verbe are correct,, the speaker is gpven the privilege of starting ihe m*w gaine, and s0 it pro\u0026eds. As turne goes, on, another action or , two is added until it is flot unusual - that is, along toward the close of them school-year - for the children to naine correçtly as many as eight acte with. the narnes of the chiidren who performed thein, aiso, in the proper order. The hardest forin of thie device is that in which. one child silently anci swiftly perforins seven or eight actions and. axioier pupil naies these acts in their proper order and also tells it ail in correct English.. - Primary F4ucation. Old subscribers will rememi1er -the %Wauable papers contributed tô the RRviEW by » the late Principal Carneron of Yarmouth. The 2qutmifn on \"The Princess\" which appear i. thý i oue were sent us by one of Mr. ýCam Ains f6rmer pupils. 220",
         "I. EUUCAT1~iAL s- v I I., s, N.vit1b and' WDuthfe id ta . é~iêI .10 tbe. dut rdnoW4 N1St4*hé ,.( blyoi*a~'i A chit-Of ï room gave ta blankt thn,-1- the tuII-là Oft*dty, wpUtat\" \"Q on'",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW*. ingob which the customs revenue wiil be placed in the oad f imen appointed at Washington, with due pro- v.ision for the graduai payment of the foreign debt. Mr. Lloyd George bas said in a public hb tbat drink is doing more damage to Great Britain thn ail the German submarines put togetber, and that the govern- ment intends takting hbold of tbe drink question vigorously. In this, Britain would only be foliowing the example of France and Russia. The condition of affaira in Mexico is far worue than ever bef ore. There is nov no recognized governme-nt in Mexico city, and it ls announced, that ail tbe foreign represent- atives have eIdt. SLIPS INiENGLISH. ýN The foilowmng list of words and phrases to be avoided is made up ini part from one prepared by a teacher ini WelesleY College for the benefit of her students. We have added several incorrect expressions 9ften heard in Canada. Do.not use - 1. Fix, for arrange, or prepare. 2. Real, as an adverb, for really, or very. 3. Some, any, as an adverb, for eomewhat, -or at ali. (These two mistaksare becoming so common that careful drill should be given -on the proper forma. We have heard teachers at Institutes say, '#real bs , reai good.\"\"Ihvstdd the matter, some.) 4. Not as 1 know, for, flot that 1 know. 5. Plural contracted verb form with singular pubject.e. g., she don't, edon't. M lthie far, for,'as far as. 7. The matter of, for, the matter with. 8. Party, for, person. 9., Taste of, uil of, when used transitively, for taste, amel, say taste it, émeli it. 10. Feel gôod, for, feel well. SOHOOL AN¶D COLLEGE. .1%é Dartmouth, N,. S. schools had an exhibitiýn, pua.- dgily of Nature.Study work, on February 9. L.A. De- Wie W lfe yDiector of Rural Science, who vas present, was Snucl pleased vith the exhibits. la Trmu, a conimittee of the Victorian Order of N4urse les engage a second nurse to do the school nursing in the pagwsshua a ngw and welli-planned and wel.equipped odioi bulng, wliçh vas forznaly opened on February 4. Tbe chairnia of *ei School Board, Mr. W. F. Sutherland, in hi.e »ig ddwpsid a. warm tribute to the memory ci tii. bft, Donad ,Msoeuay, for tventy years principal ci tii. pugwsmhScbqd\u0026. Addresmesere delivered. by Dr. A. H. MacKay, Superintetidelit of Educatloft, by, Inspector Craig and others. The people of the district were congratulated on baving sucli a fine schoo buildfig and an efficient staff of teachers. Mr. R. 0. Peasn la the Piincipal, with Miss Grace, Tabor and Mueà Ethel Gilry as assistants.q On February 16, the Domnestic Science Departmnt of Windsor Academy had a reception for the teachers ci the staff. Akwo tea had been served by the senior puiplis, the Principal of the Academy, Mr. J. Arnold Smith, presented, on bebaif of the staff,, a purse of gold and an aldress to Miss N. A. Burgoyne, who bas recently rwgud ber post as teacher, ai ter a conttnuous service of forty years. Mr. J. E. Barteau, Inspector of Technical Schoole in Nova Scotia, ta on a tour ini the interesta 0f theme. choola Mr. Barteau is visiting New York, -Boston, Toronto, Montreal and other cities to inspect the lateut equipment and study the neveat methoda in Domestlc SçimSaoea Manual Training. Mr. L. A. DeWoIfe, Director 0f RuralScee Schools in Nova Scotia, hma been ofeéred a corr..ponding poot in Saskatchewan, but bas decided to res)aIa la Nova Scotia for the presut. bn Thurudy evning, February 11, the staff and Hg School pupils of the Hampton, M. B. Cosl-ae School enter- tained the teachers and High School studeûts j0f the Kingston Cns'nau SholTegraduatet ud truftes vere al ivited. The school houés at Ammon., Wes#morlsnd Couaty, N. B., vas burned to the ground on the mornlng of Fébrc- ary 27. The builing vas of vood and about tvemty years old, but had modem deaks, @mats and vas uuil suppliedith mapsansd bakbad.There vas no The clameof 138 students at thé New Brunswick Normal School, vhom Lieutenant A. S. MaCFSJi\u0026IIOha been instruting in phy\"ia training. puned suceSWuily the exaination conducted on February 26, by Captain A.-H. Borden of Halifax. *An educational event of mmrn importance la St. jolis, N. B. was the gâthering of severai hundred womea at a meeting of the Women'a Canadian Club on Febnuary 18# to hear a lecture from Mime Knox, Head Mietreisof B Hv.r gaI Coilege, Toronto' on \"Women's Work sd Sdhco Ideals.\" Miss Knox spoke froin the standpolntpf a woman wth high ideals, vide outlook, suami clc VxPerience, and deait chegy with the need linace i th increaig opportunities of vomen, that our gjrls umul be taugbt to think clearly, to be trainud,. for omiI reuponsibility, efficiency and self-sacrifice. She iUade a very strong plea for Scripture teaching la séhocis *Ambrose Paoli,' aged tv.nty-two, Snon f Simm P~SolI, of Charlottetown, hmasbeen chosen. Rhodà' oiyob* (W P. E., Island. Paoli isno a studnt inQuen'tT, UO ItY# Kingston, Ontario. ' This year lie received lLA degree. He is nov on.military serylce vith otb*st $auiba A, ofQueen's iu the company cowmunnded by Pre A4»44«, Mcpha. k s t * Ç k7, OÇl714ý'l'- 1 ý 1",
         "f r I ~ ~ N.~w1 mnte%*tainss qietsin - Btrate ao b Dl.Aia is t has*~",
         "*EDUCATIONAL .REVIEW Our Niew Catalogue' Contai..Tuitim %Ratu .d fa nil ,.. ça*\" ruspfttàing cOrnr. f audy. et.. ii »W fr af«a Oday. No boti., unie fS orutingjum .KERRI ýw- I _oý0t Aý4 yT hem~ êL 6dd' Ëmm i i*m SmvWMQÇOBkd lia - m t } VuSEàA ISELIGET: -NO mm e mt. o earonaila en. 1. md hurm your inmswU t\u0026 m. O u l3VM\u003eYN EL8CIC NUSELIGr, Min canada, ore themant reliable you vli bd aaywibam, £h Tougtea Bulbe beln mmrbUlmagtaxii. t*Imtt» eeb\u0026vlag pOfter Ife.tbaa thoeinaordméry Phehlabus. A fui Une aof VN»\"I VLASHIGUTS rMat pricu ranstas frot. 75c. to 8\u0026.40 o«C116faaMIMos30 to0. cà. h _ _ _ We He TiORNE_\u0026col§, U t te J8 sle Pubic chols and Sanday Scbool Uibraris WEI-HAVE A VERY LARGE ASSORTMENT 0F BOOKS SUITABLE FOR LIBRARIES which we are oEeing at 'oey ow puoe STRIKE A E. G. NELON \u0026CO., S KiNe STREqgre *S.JOH4N. N 4 NOTE l PRESTON DESK it is the Montsptatinato oet inm, i ooc\"ln I amy maniary uchooç i* kma\u0026. with the. added \"dtatff low, pia. Ad 'ar dua-yu re otankd to pay a ;t «Z fer Wrieuaataingyow rquiummtu udwa wlifi n\"a a qrnetaurn. SOLE SALES AGENTS FOR EASTERN CANAA Th'e -Geo. M. Hend.ry Co... Limi-t!ed.» 215 -219 VICTORIA STOP-TR~TOT j 224 eoS e RT oit APPROVAL. mumwmmmwmmmiý . DON\"ir ý MATCH"
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4"
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "Educational review. : February, 1916."
      ],
      "text" : [
         "PAGES MISSING",
         "Ed ucational Devoted to Advanced Mthods PUBLISURD MoNTrtY. ST. JOHN, N. B., Mas. G. U. RAT. Propritor. EDUCATIONAL RBYV1W. QOioe: IfCUutenSW. I..St.Jaku, N. I. Tua.e. Maa 19844 Printed by BAMOUs a Co., Inu.. St. Jota. N. B CONTENTS: nMay eat a D n ......................... ~o1 Iterature. c S.......... . Es.e.. . .... . . .. .. S.. ..... .... ..... ... fti m .... ..... .. .......... .. . . . .. . . .. seela centr.sco......... .......... in ..................... ..c......... ... ...... come .... .... ... ................................. la . . . . . . ....b.. .... i~~ ..................., a lasen en. ..........................--..... . . .rs..T....T G . e.c .. . O...................... ... ... .. .. .. ... .. .. . . . . Niw o Ne« wood% U a The t Wabe. sbddrese en The fifteenthâ annal report ot Association for the Preyzet Of , has been isse4ai 4 4de d idea of the proes Inade in til thè White PlagSr My be #t following facts. Tesél Yý@. but one tubee*ais of Canada; MWrthrW« years ago W# he\u003eo 1 this diioi ss d*f oo Y Dorninion and of eAch søndasI e have be Opra1 Yai tel byuis",
         "EDUCÀTIONAL REVIEW. HIGH SCHOOL LITERATURE. QUESTIONS ON JULIUS CSSAR. In what three places is the scene laid? Give the situa- tion of them. Give the dates off the historic action. On how many days are the events of the play supposed to happen? Namne the tribunes. What is a tribune? Naine-tbe conspirators. The triumvirs after Caesar's deatb. The women off the play. The speaker off the first speech. Off the last speech. Who is the hero off the play? What words in I. I., fix the time off the action? Marul- lus thinks that the citizens had no reason to rejoice in Cosar's triumph. What would hie consider a reason? Does any one else in the play think they bad reason to rejoice? Marullus accuses them off fickleness. Were tbey fickle? What reason does Flavius give for plucking feathers from Cosar's wing? Is the saine reason, or any- thing like it, given by another speaker later on? Collect ail the accusations made against CoSar in Acts 1 and IL. Are any off these against bis private ie? Collect ail the sayings in bis praise. Discuss the sincerity off al these sayings. What other ways have we off iudging bis character? What evideece have we off the popularity off Brutus? What adjective is applied to him by Cassius, Cinna, Clitus and Antony? Do you think he deserved it? \"Cassius, against bis better judgment, twice gives way to Brutus.\" When? Discuss the probable differencé in the action if Cassius had flot given way? It is said that the public action of Brutus in relation to the coespfracy and its outcome was a \"series off practical mistakes.\" Name these mistakes. Can you account for them by any- thing in Brutus' character? Trace the stepe off the down- flu off the consPjiators, beginning with their expulsion from Rome. (Acta 111, 2). Study carefuliy Brutus' speech to the' citizens. 0f what did he waet to convieoe them? Judging by their words dirett1y after bis speech, had hie succeeded? Why flot? Study Antony's speech and its effect in the same way. Then comment on Aetoey's words \"I arn ho orator -to stir men's blood.\" Weigh. everY word in thee unes. Antony Ua~, \"I tell you that which you yourselves do keow.\" State definitely what hee bas told them that they afready knew., Can you show from the play that Antony was cruel, self-indulgent, u nscrupulous, self-reliant, quick to decide, siecerely devoted to Caesar, brave, a good judge off men, capable off admiring his enemies? Who said, and off or to whom- a. with hiniself at war, lorgets the shows off love to other men.' b. Oh, hie sits high in aIl thepýeople's hearts. c. 1 have not known when bis affections' swayed more than bhis reason. d. He will neyer follow anythixig that other men begin. 6. We shahl find off him a sbrewd contriver. f. This is a slight unmneritable man, meet to be sent on errands. g.No mnan else hath hongur by bis death, Explain the following words as used ini the play: Abide, addressed, aim, arrive, censure, clean (1. 3, 35) cff. lmaiah 24, 19; cliniate,' coticeit, ý 1isconi fort, entertain, favour, fond, knave. mercly, nice, physiral, prevent, sad, stare, yearfl. Passages to be ,ncmoitrizedl:--Acts 1. S. 1. 1l, 37-60; Sc. 2, 151-161, 200-210; S. 3, 20-28; Act 11IYSc. 1, 63-69, 101-111, 292-297; S. 2, 32-37; Ac. 111.-Sc. 2. the orations of Bruttus and Antony; Act IV. 'S. 3, 218-227; Act V. S. 5, 68-75. QUESTIONS ON MACAULAY'S LIFE 0F J0IýNSON. Name five eminent Englisb nwriters off tbe l8th century, and one worI off each. Give the place and date off Johnson's birt h.' Write a few lines upon bis father. In what words does Macaulay sum up jobnson's \"physical, intellectual and moral peculiarities?\" Mrite a few sentences on eacb of the Iollowing: Johnson's education, bis marriage, attempt at teacbing, I\u003eopè, Hervey, the Gentleman's Magazine, Richard Savage, the Earl off Ches- terfield, David Garrick, tbe Rambler. Name two poems, a tragedy, a tale and a biography tbat Johnson wrote. In wbat circumstances was the tale written? .it does flot appear that these two men ever saw eacb other. \" UWat two men? IZill in the blank with Macaulay's words. From wbat different ffriends did Johnson receive gr eat kindnesses? To what persons did he show kindneus? What event \" produced a change in Johnson's whole way of life?\" What publication, a. saved Jobneon's -character for bonesty,_ but adde d nothing to bis lame? b. Was' hailed with an entbusiasm such as no similar work has ever excdted? c. Is, in Macaulay's opinion \"the best off Johnson\"s works?\" What honors came to Johnson in the later part off his life? \" Yet even over such a society Johnson predominated.\" Name the principal members of this society and their dlaims to distinction. Write notes on Macaulay's opinions off Boswell, Mrs. Thrale, Rasselas, the Dictionary, \"Taxation -no Tyranny. \" Explain: Witty as Lady Mary, the poet wbo made Hector quote Aristotie, Fingal, jacobites, the Royal Academy, tbe blue ribands.in St. James' Square, the most Jacobitical place in England, the Beggars', Opera, Christ Churcb, juvenal, the Harleian Library, SecrFtary.off State, Lydia Languisb, Lord Privy Seal, the Cock Lape Ghost, under the Southern Cross, the cruel price off longevity. MY LITTLE HENS. I have some hens, and every day, At four o'clock 1 stop my play, And scatter, in the barnyard, wheat, And crumble crumbs for them to eat. My littie hens say, \"Cluck-cluck, too, I, think they mean \"Thanks -thanks,\" don't you? 178",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. 7 HINTS ON TE USE 0F TETBOOKS. L. A. DzWo. BOTANICAL ln Bailey's Botany, pages 52-58 give useful hints on the study of stems. Stems of' hard- wood trees are best studied in winter, when ne leaves obscure the mode of branching. One of the firat useful lessons is the identifi- cation of trees. by their bark, their buds'and their general shape. Then, when the trees are cut for legs or fuel;, children may distinguish between heart-wood and sap-wood. The yellow birch is excellent foi this; for the heart-wood is reddish in color, andthe sap-wcod is white. Can a tree live and grow after it has bIdt its heart-woed? A hollow- tree is common to our experience. It answers this question. Can a tree live after its sap-woed is destroyed? We can't very well destroy the sap-wood with- out destroying the bark. Th Ierefore, we1 are, net always sure whether the 1cm of uap-wood or of bark kils the tree. Ai a-matter of façt, the lois cf either 'would kilt it. We are aware that remnoving bark from .tieý white birch does flot ki1 it. But perhaps the children have 'not noticed that ordiuiarily w take only the outer bark, and- leave the ier.. A tree can stand the loscf its outer bark, but te lose the inner. bark is fatal. Some trees, such as elms, havertlir bark deePlY furrewed, lengthwise on the trunk. 'Here, agaIu., the cracks are only. ini the enter 1bark. O=_a- sionally, however, even the inner bark wll split and cerne off. This happens with our fruit trees. In such cases,, the tree always dies. Page 96 will tell us why..- Page 97 may, give a hint thae t wil help decide why crowaks in the ouler bark cf thick-barked trees are beneficial.' Lenticels- (page 89) serve thée\"mre purpose in thin-barked -trees. If children ask what bark dme for the' treÇ, one use is easily shown by paring a potato, and noticing how quickly it will shrivel if Ieft a few days. The skin cf. the potato is reallY bark. As an example cof how quickly cork ce4U will form in bark when necessar y, we need ont\u003e' refer te the change thal takes- place in a year in the letters where children -and even grown- ups - carve their naines eon treeS. During the winter is a geed tÎme to 'reid, pages 67-72. The suggestions on page 71 amt good; theugh \" Kinda of Wod\"w le .ti enly, part that can -be followed- ini winter. Pages 82-85 can be gtudied now. Bud ar'- rangement is the .maine as Ieaf.arangemaut. Therefore the 'latter can 'b. dedu -M \u003c~Ibyt exaiiring the. former. - Perhaps the two chief coto*~.tu* leaf arrangement are (1) as marks of Wden\"- aai n sd (2) advestafl ,,- îb latter would better- bctdidp u~r The experiments on pages 101 \"d 103 oùid be arred out now. Hon.. plante, -bMn\u003cgkt Ifrom morne child's home« wifl *'Ve , I fa summer there will flot be dime for Oda. , Chapter , XIIi. isworth ýr*o4uw But. a\u0026 ports, do tequaiW, tei* expeRs. Chaiter XV ig.typ\u0026coly v\u003c - z .chapter oeiId wvry fidh whest U*e bù. aS deot me W tic .pw i bmb amthe âm it. jA houes. k grwos*5 uti n. the, ioozre mpe. MWNum vanO ,bl y 4e M n ee t W1ra1vd1iqhi twX demtii e'gwmh, iiiâ",
         "180 EDUCATIONAL REVI EW. our ciothing is largely plant study. Plant distribution is fuiiy as interesting as plant structure and growth. The markets to -which our own plant products go add interest to the fact that we produce these products. The geography texf book, therefore, may weil sup- piement the botanicai text. A LEGISLATIVE HISTORY 0F NEW BRUN S- WICK EDUCATION. 1802-1847. -~JOSEPHiNE H. McLATCHY. [Confinued.] A second important measure which appeared early in the legisiation concerning parish schoois was the principle of administration through an appointed local board In the Acts of 1802 and 1805 the schools of each parish were to be under the \"direction, regulation, côntrol and manage- ment\"- of ._the'justiîces of peace of the county. In 1816 the justices of the peace were authorized to appoint\" two or more fit persons to be trustees of the schools in each parish of the county, at the time of maldng the annual appointments of town or parish offices.\" This method of., appointing the Parish Trustees continued throughout the period under consideration. Ail schools of the parish were administered by these trustees even after they were authorized to divide the parish into school districts. The duties of. these trustees were quite definitely outlîned by the -Act of 1816.' They were to hire the teacher; encourage ail the children in the parish to attend school; appoint the free scholars; expel unruly pupils; make rules and regulations for the conduct of the school; hold a public examination twice a year in each school; apportion the Provincial grant, and, if they wished, offer prizes procured with, £1 of the Government- grant. In 1823 tbe duty of reporting was added to these. In 18292 they were empowered to dismiss a teacher for negligence and gross inisconduct, but must report to the Lieutenant-Governor the conditions of such pro- cedure. By the law of 18333 they were authorized to divide the parish into as many school districts as was. found \" convenient and necessary.\", They. 156 G. 111, Cap. XXIII, secs 6,7, 8. 210 G. IV, Cap. XXII, secs 1,,2. 3eWm. IV, Cap. XXXI, secs 2, 5. were aiso empowvered to divide the Provincial \" 4grant among the schoois in the parish according to their respective caimis, whether maie or female, yeariy or half-yearly schools.\" In the Act of 1802 the control of the government wvas confirmed by the clause, \"The justices shall make report to the Lieutenant-Governor, Council and Assembiy, at the next meeting of the General Assembly, of the monies which have been used.\"' The same was affirmed by the Act of 1805. By the Act of 1816 the parish-trustees were réquired t acui nutyt the court of the Generai Sessions in each county . . .for ail monies by them received, disbursed and distributed to and for the use of their respective schools.\" In 1823 the trustees were required to report to the justices, who in turn reported to the Lieutenant-Governor-in-Council concerning the parishes of their county. A form of* certificate2 was included in the law and was to be used by the trustées for this purpose. The required content. of the trustées' report to the justices was taken up in the Law of 1829. It must include the number of school houses, the names of the teachers, the amount subscribed by the parish, the sumn obtained by tuition feesî and the number of f ree scholars \"together with such other remarks and observation as they may think necessary.' By the Act of 1833 the teacher was required to report twice a year to the trustees regarding the number, age, sex, ètc., of the pupils, the course of study, the number of days on which the school was actually open, etc. These reports were to be incorporated in the more general report of the trustees to the justices. They, in turn, sent a yeariy schedule to the Lieutenant- Gove(nor-in-Council who thereupon issued war- rantsYfor the Provinciak-grants for the different parishes. By this systemn of -elaborate accounts the govern- ment was kept informed concerning the more general facts of the administration of the schools in each parish in the province. These schools were only those which were acknowledged to be government schoois and received government aid. There was at ail times a number qf private schools in the province. I n 1820 we find an act' \" co nfirming '42 ýG. IlI1, Cap. VI, sec. 3, 24G. IV, Cap. XXV, sec. 4. 310 G. IV, Cap. XXII, sec. 5. 460 G. III, Cap. VI. a 180",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. t he.,Charter of the Madras school lin1 wick.\" These schools. were maintaii Church of England for the education of The fori of instruction was the monil of Bell. These schools were very PO province for some years, as the followi will show: In 1820 there were 992 the different Madras schools; in 182ý 4,736. Toward the close of the pericx of pupils had decreased. The 'matter of inspection and vii -early consdere -. theiegeislation,!-, of 1805' the justices were required examine each school twice a year. of 18372 the trustees were required sehools at least once in every threei the Law of 18293 the justices were a appoint a \" Committee of two or moi visit and inspect the Parish Schools ina ive countles, and if aeceeeary to rep of the sanie to the -Lleutenant-Govt Law of 1847 provided for the appoini Inspectors for the schools of the pri was a great improvement in the mat inspection. The earlier eystem by guiaranteed a system neither of -comjp tion nor of uniformi standards. The curriculum for the parish sdi the Act of i8o5e consisted of English la ing and arlthmetic. Ia 18165 the currit ed \"O(rthogrphy, -Reading, Writin metic.\" The requïrements of the te different chassesof iceasel nthe included a great vÎrietY of subjets, x= no doubt, were to be included in tl of parish,ýscoo1e. The demand that the teacher be by Hie Majesty'Royýal Instructions appeared firet ln the Act of 181621 ment reappeared i each of the subs mente. By the Law of 18377' the tel for a liceuse was to be exnmied %145 G. Ill-, Cap. XII, sac. 11. 278Wm. IV, Cap. 111, sec. 3. 31 G. IV, Cap. XXII, sec. 6. 445 G. 111, Cap. XII, Me. 9. 556 G. 1119,-Cap. XXI, sc.10. 656 G. 111, Cap. XIII, mer. 6. 77 Win. IV, Cap. VIII, sec. 10. New Bruns- attainmnents, literary' attainments and loyal pria- ined by the ciples.\" The Act of 184Tdasfd 1 oeir the poor. in terme of their atainments -in the Firt, S Wýod torial system and Third chus. opular in the The differentiation.of salary' for Mn and wOmc ring, statistics teachers appeared firet M he I Act 'Of -183\u0026 fl*m a cholars in Act required that the parish h OttldPY tW.i4t*r 14 there were at least a sum ýqua1 to the- ProvhmWughat *Iwmt* à the numnber that teacher'.suiaary, iich W», ut the i.ft Üf £20) for the mms, and £10 for-the - -v.MM sitation was twelve montha. -This provision w tdm#iIi Byhe~çt'the Act of 18W4 which_ýprovide tbýt bo\u0026 mInW to visit and -and eiüieaè t 7thériweWaeém mv By the Law f f0iflthe -ProvilicW - treaOey, oé: 2 for d~w* to visit the months.. This Atrqhe months, By should raise4t leait.aa M p.qtié authorized to By the Act of l1847 \u003ethearim-ýo* mre justices to -sam were fisdby ithé' (4 of their respect- teacherý Anu utude xrt the state £20 for a year. ~ ~ I reno.\"ThMe The .n i*itItfeS l\u003e1 MW tient of two PIOP«-pOI\u003e omince. -Thiwe rctoila é~~~ tter of school 0fOstw, 6yKf-é A petent inspec- wnttmI' con t itu\u0026 odls\" giveni ,anguage, writ- Wtk fU iculum ilud- \u003el8êIW à mahe s for the . Law of 1847 tO * fP*êb naay of. which, he curriculum ~ hiesd \"as f.-. .I.h. . . s is directed AtÎ U Ïae This requîre- ~ f u~U achr applying w* 4as to moedtal wü.Icp, -a,ë 7m cG. ni, capxvlt",
         "182 EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. DISCIPLINE. By HAZEL ALWARD -[Concluded.] Tact also guaî-ds against ail unnecessary noise in the schoolroom. The quiet school is not a dead sehool. There should always be the proper working noise, yet a schooi should be as still as is compatible with the good work and comfort of the pupils.- Noise is -a condition of disorder and if pupils are able to work in it, it remains true that they are subject to neî vous stiain such as cornes from working in. noise anywhere,.- Moving- things -demand at- tention so that unnecessary movement should be avoided. When necessary it should be quiet and natural. The teacher should know the occasion for movernents, and the pupils shouid receive permission through some signal. The teacher should keep an eye for the needs of, the school and see that materials are coliected and distribut- ed in an oi derly manner. If a school is welI controlled the pupils are kept busy, work willingly and constantly and are poLt, obedient and cheeî fui, neyer outwardly rude in look or manner. Tact neyer gives w1aý, to fickieness in discipline but holds the pupils if possible day after day to uniform conduct and effort. A fatal weakness is shown in school discipline in the experienèe of those wh9 are subject to sp asms of discipline; who punish one day for what they do not notice the next, and who turn over a new leaf every Monday miorning. .Right habits are essential to a well- governied school. Make a strong-effort., \"Wel begun is indeed haîf done.\" If frôm the first the pupils' are .held easily and firmly to duty right habits will be formed and right actions made easier. Could we but realize how soon our pupils will become mere walking bundies of habits, we would make a greater effort to guide them into right habits of thinking and acting. Every smallest stroke of vîrtue or vice leaves its never-so-littie scar. The drunken Rip Van Winkle in Jefferson's play, excused himseif for every fresh dereliction of duty by saying \" I won't count this time. \" And he may flot have counted it, and a kind heaven may not have counted it, but it was counted nevertheless. Down among the nerve celse and fibres the molecules counted it, registering and storing it up to be used against him when the next temptation came. \"Nothing we ever do is in strict scientific literali ess blotted out, \" s4ys Prof essbr James. Let us as teachers ever bear this-in mind when we are tempted, as we very often are, to lose our self-c-9ntrol or to neglect the smnallest 'fault in discipline. For minor offences contain the germs of those fully grown evils and should n\u0026 tbc ncglectcd.. \"Littke thiiigs are littie things; But faithfulness in littie tIhing!s Is somiething great.\" Tact endeavours to cteate and maintain in the ..schoolroom ,.a. 'wholeso.me school -.sentiment ..or. school spirit that makes the pupils feel that the sehool is theirs and it is their duty to maintain its good name. In a school in which such sentiment prevails the v ei y few boys and girls who ai e inclined to cause trouble are compar- atively harmnless because they cannot and do flot receive the endorsement and counitenance of their better-disposed school mates. Tact is constantly increasing his knowledge of the subjects taught and iniproving his methods of presenting them. H1e thus kiings new life into every recitation and does much towaî ds removing the dul monotony that is likely to accompany routine work. Tact also sees that the school work is careiully ai ranged, the school roomn kept at right temperature and properly ventilated, and always does as much as he demands of his pupils. And now we must corne to the most unpleas- ant part of schooi discipline, that of punishment. One of the first objects of a wise i uler is to dispense with the necessity of inflicting; punish- Ment altogether. But this cannot always be accomplished. Nevertheless, it ie obvious that we should neyer use severe measuî es when the less severe can be made to serve the purpose. While the eye commands-lrespect the voice is unnecessary. While a gentie rebuke will suffice the harder tories of indignation should not be used. And it i~s not until the voice ceases to be obeyed at ail that -we should resQrt to severe measures. Finally, when %uch punishments do become necessary, though the teacher cannot keep out of view the moral effect. of the punishment on those who might otherwise be tempted to do wrong, yet his main object should be to hi ing the pupil who has strayed back again into the right path of, obedience and duty. Af teî ail, appeal to honor is the highest form of discipline. \"Control a child's actions through 182",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. control of bis will, \" is one of the great, pro- fessional rules, yet the will cannot bé- foîeed but the real teacher knows that it can be led. \"We cannot find room on our time table for such high minded moral discipline,\" some one may say; :and neither we can, nor is it necessary:- Some of the weightiest lessons which we learn in regard- to the formation of our own characters are flot 1earnegl by way of direct instruction. Again quoting from J. G. Fitch: \"Moral teacl4ng should be the hidden secret of school discipline,\"P it runs through every subject ini the school curriculum like a -gôldéù-thrêad.' ---What-subjet could be better ïuited' for the teaching of morals than literature? And could.it be possible to overlook the value of moti teacbing in history? \"We hear Philip Sidniey, thirsty and dying on the field of Zutphen, refusing the cup of vater and giving it to a poor soldier with the worde, \"'Thy neesWty, is greater than mine. \" We- think of Wolfe on the Heights of Quebect \"Mta cry, \"iThey rua!p\".\"Who rua?\" \"The Freach.\" \u0026\"'Then 1 die happy\" We hem the i W\u003cnds o f Lord Nelson at Trafalgar still echoiag down through the ages and thrilliug the hearta cf thousands today, \" England expects every a this day to do his duty,\" and he himbOif set thÇ example though it coest him his life.. And -as, we realize these soenes, we know that thiSisa a bOtter world for us to live in because such deeds haye been done and we canuot fail to se1 MOre closry what human duties and true human gresataffs are. In the study of nature we are, thinkipg God's thoughts after Him.- In studying the g91«y of the heavens and the beauty of the fié,4da, e are beholding a lovelinees which Àt was Hio delight to'coeate. What better MOtal te cbiùgs can -me find than these? In like manner ma4ie- matics has its own spca moral 1esn. ti a discipline in exactnes, in perfect honestY and patience, and mocet of alI in perseverailoe by means of which the pupil can be made to feel that it is the harcl taaks that couuat thM.tbtere are millions of people to do' the easy t14ngs th«t it takes rugged strength, great dgtemiûn*ti« and a noble Purpose'to overçoml the 4U1lt situations and to, do the thinge Whilib briug * honor and fortune and progPle-ofthe w\u003c*14'\u0026 And so we find that evety sqieWct booê its moral teachiffl if we but look for it, an4'wt muet have many objects in view which we eSs- flot set clown -and provide fWi --a - tîme- t\"l. Perfect discipine is not only characterfr4 by strict order, by right methode of instuwtis or by vigorous mental activityr, but dsbould.be pervaded through and through bY hih Put. by th~e spiit Of iwork, by a- kn üiC e and bye the love ýof tnitth. '. Tàs- oniy as far as ve beâie kwuW*Yof ta~ Let us lookback over 20ur W reallthe mem«W ies ve aikbs4 *du A* us Iook forwardîigto th* iv0( oupvtiw*m recoilectiomns we woWld 1k. ,lg us and Our teaçhisng. These. wl ot théeleow»we -hvme1 esd wji:ýth tb\u003e",
         "184 EDUCATIONÇAL REVIEWV. pupils. Children do flot soon forget a devoted teacher. lnvoluntarily they- give her a large place in their hearts, and a generous share of their affections. And of ten in after life when they suifer from the iude jostlings of a selfish world, and seriously question if there be such a principle in human nature as j ustice or disinter- ested love, they fondly revert to the beloved teacher of their early youth, whose character was a living personification of truth and justice, and whose heart a deep fountain of love, pure and_, ,neyer failing, and check their incipient misanthropy -and forget -their- sorrows, in the sweet remembrance of her gentleness, fidelity and love. A yet higher reward awaits bier when she closes bier mission, quits the field and rests f rom her labor; for then the angels do greet her as their fellow-laborer and f riend and welèome her with delight to their society and home; then she hears a voice fromn the excellent glory saying, \"Well done, good and faithful servant,\" and enters with «triumph into the joy of her Lord. Upon hier ýombstone no epitaph need be written, for upon thle tablet of many a juvenile heart, she bas traced bier character in a living inscrip- tion, more honorable and enduring than was ever written upon the monument of sage or conquer- or.. 0f ber life no obituary need be given, for bier surviving pupils are bier living epistles, where mnay be read, in lier own autograph, the trans- cript of herself. Many characters bas she stamped with the impress of hier own, in lineaments too deep for time to efface, too abiding for eternity to obhiterate. Many friends bas sbe guided along the pleasant paths of wisdom, virtue and piety to- ward Heaven, and thither bier \"works do follow\" her. Ages roll away -still joyfully she gathers in the broad fields of Paradise, the ricb barvests of ber eartbly toil. THE BRU. Clad in coat of brown and yellow, Oh, the bee's a lucky fellow; For when summer's at its prime He's ini clover all-the time. -Clinton Scollard in You\u003cih's Companion. Your paper is so bright and helpful, 1 enjoy reading it.-G. M., Maine. NOTEýS ON SCHOOL READERS. BY 'THEi.IITOR. FIRST ANI) SECOND READERAs, NE.w BRUNSWICKC ANI) NOVA 'SU(OTIA. When the children are reading the poems in these books, begin to teach them something about rhyme. After a verse has been rcad, close books, and write the verse on the board, substituting a word for one of the rhymes; e. g. in, -Whoever you are, be noble; WVhatever you do, d1o well; Whenever y'ou speak, speak kindly; (;ive joy wherever voitdwell. Substitute \"livýe\" for *'dwcll\" and cal upon children tg comment. Do this with other verses. Why do these lines flot sound right? Because they do flot rhyme. Well, then, what is rhyme? Get a definition from the children. Tbey will probably say that it is the sounding alike of the words at the ends of the lines. Put this definition on the board. Why do the poets use rhyme? Because it sounds pretty. Do, you know anything besides the verses in your books that is written in rbyme? (Songs and hymns.) Tell children that the first poets sang or recited their verses. They were flnot written down, but one persan Iearned themn from listen- ing to another. Now can you think of any other reason for making rhymes. (Easier to sing, easier to remember.) If children have had any information taught themn in rhyme, such as \"Thirty days bath November,\" the last reason may have'-been thought of sooner. Suppose we say:- 1 have a cat, oh, such a pietty cat! 1 cannot tell you how 1 love my cat. I'm sure you neyer saw so nice a cat. Would this be rhyme? There may be a difference of opinion hei-e. If so, examine some of the verses in the reader. Children will find out that the rhyming' words must not -be exactly alike. Name different rhymes for words in --the reading lesson. Put a verse new to, the children on the 184",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. boa--rd, Ieaving out o:te or more of the rhyminrg words, and let them fil the blanks. A violet by a mossy atone Haif hidden from the eye, Fair as a tar, when only orne la shining in the The rooka are alive On the tops of the They look like a 0Of jolly black bees. They ail squawk And loud is theïr It muet be the weather That ets them a-talkring. The froot and the Are gone from the lane; They both had to go When the @un came Three littie goblins orne day found A baby sleeping on the - Hand in hand they daioed Seethê swa sua Wbîl. I1scatter for The haf of my cake On the top of the Some of this work may be done lat 1ests In another lesson the arrangement of 111Ms may be notioed. Look at the hre l, \"My Shadow\" and \"The Ponid,\" N. N .keader 2; \"Drive Gently,\" N. B. Reader 1; :\"The Little Snow-Shoveller,\" N. B. Reader 2. Put on the blackboard, lSmthe inS rhyme in pairs.\" Then a*k, ho mmny poems with rhymes 'in pairs can'you, flux! lu yoUr reader? Then take lines rhyming inthrees, as in, \" Pull the Weeds \" and \"A Song for Little May.\"- The chiîdreft-,\u003ewùl be eagçr. to look for other arrangements4, and dlWereat exercises for seat work wil suggst thenudevts, useful for, training eye. anid car. Mae lista o\"fQi the rhymes lan certain pocins. Numbor ;'the different rlWmes in each poSr 6 . g.nl \"Th Arrow and the Song, \" 1. air, ofre; 2- sgbt, flight; 3. strong,' song. Pick olit the .rhyn words that are spelled aflke, .aS s$#mgs5; those that are spelled differeatly, au air, v44 Suitable versesfor study of' nhymes JmePi N. -B. Readers:-zWpaderlaflýd, Tne, Mmulnid the, Briars, The Four Sunbeams Tii. FO\"s Mouse, Sleepy, Harry. laI N. S. Reader, November,.-Sevepi Times 'OueThIe Blu*bfrd, The Blind Men and the ElePhant, 0c\"ebs Party, Cherries. For ear training,. read to the children verse with different rhyme arrangements and. lut them -write down or naine thte rhyâ:ilng words. ['Ne are indbted-, for suggestions on t\". subject to a tesson l in r Tua chars' WorM, ýLoàdo.J TEE P21AIT eAU. Tis exercseàas ntodedto malme * 4*:USWr' quickly and sat quily, iMdto'qeýÔut ilbuerloia at ali zms Ail stand l in d Orne cld la éboosé»ék M éW- and sta ndslath e.centr e. or oshs tpats \"M thiuk of the -answer, w\"ic mut be la two seondorne, enandint lg\"Ti answer stepe fowaïrd,'t uy ,t *tait, lanr iJeS!grdcsly fonamd. 1Tlé Answem.: 1. Fkam 4p% n 2. BU\u0026u dn. Sm wooeifa -'ù Anomer: 1. Bus~ 2. .b B. las pSlâ*àd~4o",
         "186 EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. Winter Birds. Blue Tit, blue The snow is on the wood; What can tit-birds do When beaven bides their food? They flit from twig to twig They hunt on every tree, And cry, Tit, tit, I ar n ot big, Yet here's no food for me. (6) Point up for trees. (7) H-ands lifted, with finger-tips touching, to form roof of bouse. (8) Horizontal gesture for clothes-line. (9) Fingers chase each other like children running. (10) Clap hands. (14I) Motion of making and throwing snowballs. - Primary Educalion. A LESSON IN PUNCTUATION. Dear Robin asks for bread, 0 corne and find it too! Your dinner here is always spread, Blut Tit,- blue. -L. A. Taderna - frorn The Children's Cameos. A February Finger ,Play. The ground was ail frozen (1) And ugly and bare; The leafless trees shook (2) In the cold winter air. Then a gentie gray cloud Floated over the sky (3) And dropping and drifting (4) The snowflakes came by. They covered the ground() With a catpei of light. They wrapped ail the trees (6) In soft rnufflings of white. The dingy old houses (7) SLike paaces shone; Into filmiest lace-work The clothes-lines (8) had grown. Then the cblidren ran out (1) With their cheeks glowing red. \"Ho, ho, for inow-balling!\" (O They merrily said. ---iThe white halls fiew briskly, (1 They sped to and fro, And beauty and bappines Carne with the snow. MOTIONS. (1) Hands brought together in front, palrns down, and then spread apart with a gesture to show the extent of the ground. (2) Armas held up and shaken stiffly for leafless trees. (3) Hands raised above head with rnotion- of cloud moving across sky. (4) Hands brought down like the falling snowflakes. (5) Sarne rnotion as (1), with fingers shaking for snowflakes falling. Here is a suggestion for a lesson in punctua- tion, sent to the REVIEW by a Nova Scotia tea cher. Put on the board a drawing of a railway track, with a train -approaching from the dis- tance. THE RAILWAY TRA.IN. There she cornes at last! Do you bear ber blow? Listen to the rails singing the song of a journey. \" Squeaky, squeaky, \" say the wheels. \" Ding, dong, \" rings the bell. \"Puif-if,\" pants the engine, and stops quite stili. Now we are off . The engine begins its song: \"Ive got your trunk, V've got your trunk, I've jot your trunk!\" \"Who-oo-oo? Who-oo-oo-oo? said the whistle. \" Who! Who!\" And Katie and 'Helen and little George say: \"Won't Granny be glad to see us?\" ADVANCED SPELLING.-Etiquette, miscrea nt, diversion, ameliorate, fac simile, surplice, trous- seau, cheviot, crinoline, zephyr, textile, Bologna, tough ', artificial, grotesque, amethyst, annuity, taciturn, prestige, indictment, reservoir, con- noiseur, gauge, crucible, oxidize. PRIMARY SPELLING.-Newspaper, lunch, pri m- ary, cloak, dlock, watch, garden, parsnips, lettuce, pantry, chicken,. corn, calm, cowboy, pr~airie, catfisb, minnow, creek, curb, street- car, electric light, gaslight, matches, lamp- chimney. ________ I find the EDUCATIONAL REviEW a great help to me in my school work.-A. H., Carleton Co., N. B. 186",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. NATURE STUDY INi GRADE MH. THE CURRIENT HI8TORY CLÂBS. Grade 111 at Acadia St. school, Arnherst, N. S., is a busy class and seerna to enjoy the nature- lessons as rnuch as last year's class did.- The following examination paper- covers rnuch of the work of this quarter- and is just as it was written. Ten questionswere given. NATURE. QUINcEX y.REID. '1. The aphid harms leaves because it sticks the juice. The aphid can be kiled by soap suds and kerosene. 2. There are rny aphids in the summer, they corne out of the egg in the spring. 3. The work of the queen bee. is to lay eggs. 4. The difference between honey and nectar is that the nectar is in the flower and the bee cornes along and sucks up the nectar. lt,,goes down in ber throat and it cornes out'honey. 5. The potato bug is différent from_ the bSm because the bee bas a stinger and the potato bug hasn't. The potato.bug bias stripes on its back and the bee hasn't. 6. The caterpillar gets into thie apple,,becaube in the sprîng the- mother laye ýan egg int»e a4ple flower and the apple grows big and It hatches and the caterpillar cornes 'out-. The caterpillar goes down on the. grouad.,and4 crawls up the tre\u0026 'trunk and goos wider, the bark to sleep for the winter., 7. The woodpecker ie good to the apple growere because it pecks at, the trees and' the insecte cornie out and the woodpecker picks -out. the caterpiliars' of the apple. 8. We see more shiepherd'a \"purSe and plain- tain because theY are 'Weede , and theY have a lot of see41e où them.- (Drawings of tbese plants were made.) 9. Three uses of hernlock is it, e gSd for under water because it won't rot'and it iie good f or wood and tanning and lumber. 10. Four uses of spruce is. it i., good for Christmnas trees and poBts and '9M and to bank t'he house. A spruce twig as short needles on kand it see. N INA E. DAvISON:, i. Name the Britth poumuioslm Aies, dteame how and wheu cadi wa acqulro. What pan have South Africans takinlthe ver? 2. Who arm Sir Chartes Muuro1 5f Perey Lake, 0 Shih-Kai, Sir Ccli SprIug-RicS? 3. What is tic substance of the w!qis e htw the German sud Brlih oeum\"a.q Hov vas the crepodssC:rïI0CM? 4. What is.,sumaodr in, ÇQW\"? Wlf-Imod*i stepi have 1stsy beotikesii. * Ll»«W » Canadian Parlinmeuts towarctffcpytu%, theS e .\"Germsay'scaupsigm agliqut 8\"'- fg vith unexpecte obotaels dm oetta14 Diocam the geogmphial pod\"'O1 Eflt ms14 the war. Wha±tein -*e IMpofttan cia this ver? And vhat resourcos o elhv{\u003e Powers (b) theAU..? *- 7. St. Màtthe* x, 284. 10. St. Ittcwx3S4 12. Gwsà .Ma t lM.U 13, Ge\"s u~ 12. Gmnsul xis'i.18.\u0026 m3 Glenià1e..Èxif 17. St. maJisw a4iii #810 AM~$ 9.. St. Mitéhwxii4 Ilhé wtliehaý f children .occasionat position, it$aAt*C1 Each chikidwos*om of àt b 't--i . indd ,12",
         "I SS EDUCATION AL REVIEW. WHO, WHAT AND WHERE.. QUESTIONS FOR FE-BRUARY. 1. Who was condernned to wear hung about bis neck the body of the bird he had siain, and why? , 2. What bird long lived the pride of the countryside, And at last in the odour of sanctity died? 3. Where did the last of the Gairfowl stand, and wbat, kind of tears did she weep? 4. What bird stood nearly six feet higb, and seen from behind looked rather' like 'a very proper bald-beaded parson? 5. What bird is called: a. darling of the spring, b. the sea-blue bird of March, c. the Arabian bird, d. \"a creature of a fiery heart,\" e. pilgrim of the sky? 6. Who were, Grip, poor Matthias, Chul? QUEsTIONs FORt JANUAIY. DOMESTIC AFFAIRS. (Ail from Standard Novels.) 1. What supper was a disappointment because the host thought the asparagus flot quite boiled enough? 2. Who had an exquisite art of making ber cleanliness more uncomfortable and unacçeptable than dirt itself? 3. Who thought. that to wear the same curled front on Sundays and weekdays \"would be to introduce a most dreamn-like and unpleasant confusion between the sacred and the secular?\" 4. What family were confused at being caught playing \"Hunt the Slipper,\" by two great acquaintances from town? 5. Where was an assault repelled-by a dish of scalding hot kalebrose? ANSWERs. 1. The supper at Hartfield on 'the nigbt of the bail at the Crown. Emma. Ch. 38. 2. Mrs. Joe Gargery. Great Expectations. Ch. 4. 3. Mrs. Glegg. The Mill on the Fioss. Ch. 7. 4. The Primrose Family. Vicar of Wakefield. Ch. il. 5. At Tillietudlemn Castle. Oid Mortality. Ch. 24. Only four sets of answers this month, and onty one set perfect. Marks allowed, 10. Waterloo, 10; Gi,ý M. L. L. Club, 89; Alert, 7. THE QUESTION BOX. M. ýV. H. 1. \"The Hunter's Moon.\" A name for the full moon next after the harvest mioon. The harvest moon is the moon which is full within a fortnight of the autumnnal equinox (September 22rid or 23rd.) 2. Aurora Borealis. A luminous atmnos- pheric phenomenon, considered to be electrical, radiating from or occurring near the earth's northern or sotiern rnagnetic potes; visible from tirne to tile by night. Often called northern (or southern) lights, Aurora Borealis, or Aurora Australis. M rs. A. 1. Pronuinciation of \"Khaki.\" Either Kah-kee, or Kar-kee. The word is variously spelled. It is Urdu, and means dusty, hence, dust coloured. As a noun, a fabrie of khaki colour. 2. The Anglo-Japanese Alliance was, con- cluded when Lord Salisbury was Prime Minis- ter, and was bis doing. The treaty, or mère properly speaking, the convention embodying it was signed on January 3th, 1902, by Lord Lansdowne, the foreign secretary. The object of the alliance was the protection of the respec- tive interests of England and japan in China and Corea. The terms are too long to quote in fult. In case of either England or japan being ifr.olved in war with another power, the contracting party was to remain neutrat. If a second enemy power took part in the war, the other party to the alliance would corne to the aid of ber atly. See Current Events in REviEW for November', 1915. 3. Ratisbon is in Bavaria. But in 1809 the Austrians were, fighting in Bavaria. After the battie of Eggrnuhl in 1809, tbey retired upon Ratîsbon and the pursuing French defeated themn again beneath its watts and reduced a great part of the .city to ashes. An answer to M. V. H.'s question about Househotd Economy- wou.td taire too much spacýe in this column. We hope to give some suggestions on the subject in a later issue. WORTH REMEMBERING. Jacob Abbott, author of the Rotto books and much other useful and interesting, although old-fashioned, juvenile literature, lays down the following fundamental rules for teachers and parents: \"When you consent, consent cordiatty. When you refuse, refuse finatly. When you punish, punish good-naturedty. Commeid often. Neyer scold.\" Some bulky volumes on teaching contain. tess pedagogical wisdom. A very skitfut and 'success- fui teacher attributes much of ber success to a faithful observance of these five concise and simple rutes.-Exchange. w 188",
         "EDUÇATIONAL REVIEW. ROT LUNCES -IN A COUNTRY SCHOOL. In the Domestie Science Clams at the Sussex Rural School, Iast July, différent teachers told how they had macle their Domestie 'Science lessons useful in ungraded country schools. Here. are some suggestions (rom other places. The first one cornes fromn Nebraska. A teacher writes to The School News, 1 , began serving hot lunches in rny schoollm September, 1911, because the cold lunches the children brought with themn were so unappetiziiig and lacking in nutrition. We have flot missed having our daily hot dinner in aIl the twenty- four months of ochoot ýthat have followed our venture. We have found that, it pays. The children do more and better work, the attendance has improved, and the parents tell me that the general health of the- children is better. We prepare the vegetables for dinner at recess and it takes onfy a moment to set them over the fire later. If I amn busy when. the cooking needs attention, one of the girls attends to it. We use our desks for tabl es.- Each child lays bis table and furnishes bis -own bovi, plate, paper napkins, cup, knife, fork and. sponn. Af ter lunch each one clears hie own table and takes his dishes to the desk thàt is used for a cook table. .While we are eating our lunch we plan whis we shall serve the 'next daY, and each \"bl furnishes that which is most convenient.ý We try to keep each one's share evenilv roportioÎied, but this is the hardest part -of theëwQrk, for, Most of the mothers are so grateful that*tey f requently send a jar of fruit or preserves wihen- their children's share of the lunch is a quart of milk or some butter. Parents reinretEl hot luefor th\u0026ir Cidrenwhen the Uioibc actively opposed £0 Domesic Science. T is la splendid opportunity for the teacher to give a good lesson i D omestic Scieffl, for the-.rai can be. turned to food values, the caae --anc cooking ,cf foodt etc.;, anm he i cdmshawP helped to plan the dinnera theyhvebQi interested i tiese thigs. We have. a varietY Of dbshe$ that w. sr but soup meved very hot andi hot chSoohte ai' our favorites. Boffledbeef witfr uidbo #W potatoes baked ini the- ashes- is one of Our raid- winter meais. We did-the ookng *e firet yeron a Ne.18 Round Oak Heater, but bâat yen Purmmd-a\" small oil stove that acde rat xsofomOt especially on wann days I havtf* he. h cooking utensils but the mother aviiy*M c0oe ; flurish saihnlv ièe. From the \u0026kol Bu4d# (N.V\u003eW~~4 following: \"At a- meeting of grade, teadirsmis of Morley showed a fireIessO\u003e*esr MW ' pupils, under her dbtctiwi, Wb\" IcW ý used to provide -a fr* dlshf children who muet dePOW O a b00 A wooden caaidY Pi Wu and lineci with aébBéýl _ f9O*' mnade in the centre for a* iilY it lsauan lp«tant factor la * vites cf her PlanaiW! bea mt .hf a\u0026y Wehve -a, the,«er Wi, d j * Fmuc-,ht at tumt' whatever is needed.'~- Why~t 94 e.yqm_ çqýIthe, 4% e a trqi 4",
         "90EDUCATIONAL ,REVIEW. THE LAZY BRAIN. Th e bouse bad been very quiet for an- hour and a haif. In deference to Fred Gates, working on bis final Englisb thesis, the noisy twins bad been banishcd t o a neigbbor's, the grocery boy'; and the butcher's boy had been headed off at the gate, and the whole establishment, figurat- ively spcaking, bad beld its breatb. Now Fred bad emerged from bis seclusion. \"Well, did you get the thesis finished?\" asked bis Uncle John. .r \"No, I didn't,\" Fred admitted miserably. \"I just couldn't secm to tbink clearly; something kept interrupting My ideas.\" \"O Fred,\" mourned bis mother contritely, \"pcrhaps it was my sweeping, but I did try to bc quiet!\" .\"Humph!\" snorted Uncle John. \"rd know what's wrong with you - mnental laziness.\" \"4Why, John Hazzard!\" exclaimed Fred's mother indignantly. \"You don't understand, uncle,\" Fred protested. \"Oh, don't I? Young man, I'm going to sbow you something. I think I beard you declare the other day that if you could Write an editorial as polished and logical as one of those by* Grant Smith in the Globe, you'd die bappy.\" \" You certainly did. He's my ideal of a' writer.\" \"Ail right, then, corne along with me.\" Fred was thrilled to discover they were going to visit the editorial offices of the, Globe. \"I know Grant Smith,\" bis. uncle informed bim, \"and I'm going to show him to you at work.\"? Fred -found his ideal of a writer seated, flot in cloistcred seclusion, as he had expcctcd, but in one corner of a vcry large room well filled with men, clacking typewriting machines, and jingling telephones. From the floor above, where the forms of the -afternoon edition were being made up, carne the sound of pounding, and througb -the, h1ilf-opened -windows drifted the roar of traffic from the street below. In the midst of ail that ordered confusion Fred's hero sat at a typewriter, picking at tbe keys slowly, and pausing from time to time to gaze with unseeing eyes'at the wall before bim. Fred was borror-struck wbcn bis uncle smotc the writer familiarly on the shoulder; but Grant Smith scarccly turned bis hcad, regarded his friend ly assai Ian t wi t h a re recognlition, and waved bis band vaguely toward a vacant chair. As-Fred watched, a nessenger Iboy blundered noisily upon the m-orker and. was wavcd away. Presently an office boy called the writer to the telephone, from whi*ch he returned in a moment as if in a daze, and resumied -'bis writing witbout hesitation. Then a fellow worker strolled over and demanded a match. The writcr did flot hear him. Witb a sly wink at Fred, the intruder pro- ceeded to pick Grant Smith's pockets of matches, and bore them off unnoticcd by bis victim. A quarter of an hour later Grant Smith's task was done. He summoned a'copy boy to carry away bis manuscript,' and turncd with a sur- prised cry. \"By George,\" he exclaimed, grasping Fred's uncle by the hand, \"when did you corne As the visitors strolled away -fromn the Globe office, Uncle John listened for some time to Fred's entbusiastic praise of Grant Smith. 111 don't sec how he- does it!\" Fred marveled. \"How can he write in that madhouse?\" \"Simple enough. Grantý Smith bas traincd bis brain to work for bim. You can do the same thing; so can any man, but few do. .\"This morning, in quiet seclusion, you couldn't think out your thesis. That was flot because anyone intcrrupted you, but because your brain, like the brains of thousands of untraincd workérs, was playing hookey, and you badn't the wiII to keep it at its taàk. The manwho can make bis brain obey hirn, and wbo can kecp bis thougbts on the job until bis work is donc, can succced flot only in writing, but at any 'task be chooses.\" \"But how do you start?\" Fred demanded. \"How did you win the quarter-mile last year?\" \"Imade up my mind to do it,' and began training every day.\" \" Exactly. You r brain is j ust another set of mus- cles . Why flot train tbem ?\"- Youths' Companion. The capture by the Austrians, of Mount Lovcen (p'ronounc- ed Lof-tsen), on January 10, was immediately 1'followed by the capture of Cettinje (Tset-teen..ye), the capital of Monte- negro, which ig but six miles distant, and with that the con- quest of Montenegro wasvirtually coniplete. The importance of the victo-ry is in that it brings a large part of the eastern Coast of the Adriatic for the tume being under Austrian rule. Austrian and Bulgarian forces are invading Albania, where a few Italian, Aibanian, Montenegrin and Serbian troops WiIl defend the principal towns on the coast. King Nicholas of Montenegro is now in France. 190",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. 9 HOW TO SEURS ACCURACY IN ARITHMETC -The degree of approach to accuracy by a pupil does flot depend so mucb upon the amount as upon the cha racter of the work done. Care- less facility is nôt merely useleas; it'is positively harmful. Hence, while' the probleme provideci for the pupil may be .much more simple in respect to the amount of figuring tequired, the importance of accuracy muet be emphasized to a very mucb greater degree, than has usually been the custom of téachers in the grades.* Indeed the pupil muet flot be commended at all for inaccu rate work -for work in which there is one wrong figure! It muet be impressed upon him in the very beginning that ciphering in which tbere are errors bas no value wbatever. His task must be, flot the solution of ten probleme Iwith but f ew errors, but rather as many problems as he.can solve without making. any mistakes. Hie seat work in àrithmètic (andi bis home work, too, if any be assigned). should be, for the moet part, mechanical,. and .èo simple tbat b. can concentrate bis whole energy upon the matter of accuracy. t should b., sometbing that be well knows how to do, the only question being, can he do it accurately?, In tbis way, and in this way only, can proper emphasis béi put upon the importance of'aboolute correctnes. When papers or diates upon which Jes the work of many pupils to whom thei task. of copying and figuring had, been' assigned a presented to- thé teacher for examigation, k l-eî flot well, for her to consider tôOemuch ýthe number of ërrors made by each pupil. Each paper Â8 right or wfrong; PerfectOr imnpefect; good or wortMess. Whether it contains omm erro« or ten, it muet b. put into. the imperfecdcama4 Ail the puils who make mistakes M fïgurng muet, for the moment at least, be classed togetber, whether the. number of errors is two or ten. in either case the. work la unseatWavtorYt unreliable, worthless. I f, in the. daily* tests of the, ability of pupôls in figuring, more than twenty-five per cet ',f the papers are Imperfect, the. teaciier is at f*It. Either the lesson la too heavy or, lthe t4er does flot sufficientlY imprffl 1Uffl the pupgô he importance, of accuracy. iperiiig. The seat workten .rcieIr~~rs~ sbould b. made. so light, 'and the. pup eaoeww' aged toexerc so much careinthe doing ôf it, that seventy-five to ninety per, cent'. oft papers wili b. perfect. When -tuia dogmetp accuracy has been attied, the ;am\u0026dnt Of,41Y work for those. pupiiu who, 9.#u4Y Pin.W Od* papers,may b. somwh4tx incoea«no- tg M A case and in ail the grades uo~ I~ muet b. the. aim. To what le~** pupil. continue to 'iai4at*ot- one enior? is the, qu\"stoiifor, the for the pupil. TSo often it has been the - Cutm.toM0*1 paper 90 if only-aole- probm-;In», MW**el an error.. Often --oshah I m.ay pupil bas been taught tu ii.t i,*~ cent of accuracyiiAnithe d If on e'' fi gure wê marWd ,a*4 9\u0026$ is and in -thefift * ra le to andgh n that ptee i n pe fr noàt àty \u0026 a t\"«heranid fla, cfe - in \"t . , loi- . 1",
         "192 EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. HOW MEN DIFFER FROM ANIMALS. The chief di fference- between man and the\u003e iower animais lies in man's capacity for sinning. Obviously he has no monopoiy of the virtues. A dog may be faithful, an elephant may be ldnd and truc, a cat is said to love home and fireside;, the parental instincts of the penguin woplid put. nine-tentbs of the leaders of our best society to shame. It is not by posseMing such attributes that animais become \".almost buman.\" It wouid be fairer to our furred and feathered friends to say that . .the man who possesses these traits in fine degree is almost animal. There is a horse of vaudeville famne that reckons simple sums in addition, and answers a wide variety of questions, if mny memory serves me; I will even allow himi to write hi s own first naine with bis hoof in the sand. The show-bills caîl himi \"human\" yet we feel no sense -of kinship as we watch the perform~ance, even thougb we should grant him ail the ratiocination bis exlhibitors claimi We simply say, \"What a %vonderfully clever horse!\" bestow a word of praise upon bis traîner, and that is the whole story. 1 have seen a dog performn agile tricks with. prompt obedience and obvious, enjoyment, and to me hie was stili a dog. But when some canine friend hides on bis wash-day; when hie steals the cat's milk and pretends hie did not; when hie slinks in at a door with every expression of eye and 11mb crying \"peccavi ,\" ah, 'then I say to myseif, \"There is something human about that dog.\" -Burges Johnson in Harper's Magazine for J anuary. EXPLAINING THE TELEGRAPH. As a general rule, thec telegraph no longer arouses the' wonder .and awe that it did in our gràndfathers. In remote countries, however, there are stili people who have neyer heard of it, and who are unable to understand it. Das Ecizo tells of the perplexity that the telegraph caused in a smali village of Bosnia. The government bad installed.a telegrapb uine from Prijedor to Bahatsch. \"WVhat is -the meaning of this wire?\" asked the astonished inhabitants of a village through which the line bappened to pass. \"It is a telegraph,\" said the beadman of the village, who hiad been in consultation with the qfficials. \"One can send a mes~sage along this wire, straigbt fronm hére to Stamboul.\" The villagers were. incredulous. \"Tnat is impossible. How can a message run along a wire?\" The headman thought awhile; then he bit upon the proper explanation. *'Imagine,\" he said, \"a dog that is terribiy long, and whose tail is stretcl4ed like the wire on these poles; imagine that bis tail is so long that be reaches 'from bere to Stamboul., Now, suppose we pincbed bis tail bere. Wouldn't be bowl in Stamboul?\" The villagers understood.- YoutIz's Companion. CURRENT EVENTS. The magnificent parliament buildings at Ottawa, consadered the finest Gotbic structure in America, and rivaling in beauty any otber parliament bouses in the world, were destroyed by ire on the night of February 3. The ire spread rapadly, and several persons lost tbeir laves, while many otbers had a narrow escape. Canada produces about three-quarters of the nickel used in the world. It bas been sent out of the country for refining; but probably some means will be found of keeping this indus- try at borne. Thç reports of government engineers are very unfavourable to the completion of tbe Hudson Bay Railway, and the work may be abandoned. Tbe greatest engineering difficulties are in connection witb the cbaracter of tbe sbores, wbich offer no secure foundation for barbour works. Recerïï explorations in Hudson Bay have shown that the Beicher Islands are much larger than was supposed, the largest island being over a bundred miles long, and the Iength of the entire chain many hundreds of miles. The railway between South Africa and Southwest Africa, rapidly constructed by General Botha last year for military purposes, wilI be of great importance in times of peace. It is tbree hundred miles in lengtb, extending from Prieska, on the Orange River, to Kalkfontein, and saves many hundred miles between points in South Africa and those in Southwest Africa, as compared witb the old route by rail to Cape Town and thence by sea. Tbrough trains are now running from South African points to Walfisch Bay. Mucb of the material used in commercial fertilizers bas hitherto corne from Germany. A Canadian inventor bas found a process of obtaining potash from ordinary feldspar, wbib pOmis9es to be of great importance; and valuable deposiis of phosphates have been discovered in the Rocky Mountains, soutb of the Canadian boundary. Other sources of botb, potasb and phosphates will be eagerly sought, so thtwe may be independent of the German supply. 1 Huerta, former dictator of Mexico, died last month in Texas, wbere he was in prison on a charge of attempting to violate the.neutrality laws of the United States. 192",
         "ÈDUCATrIONAL. RE'VUW. There are three go euet chools in the Provinceof 0 Quebec for teaching the 'be# way of ümaing nwpleuw4gar. The annual output of maple sugar and, syrupin that Provine -,1 ^ - alone is more than 'a million dollars. ¶Bac Reot fo wtmln ay that a republican pryo - vate conidrabe owe hî benfcrmed la Geriàany. The'over- IU* SPt' d' r - throw of the Kaiser by hie o*n. people maf yet pût an Enâd'to ',\"Àwï4-tq»j the war, if theme reports are trie. nçtr. last year to mil around the niorth of Siberïa, arriN-ed saftely tg ri4noe of wa at Archangel before that port wus closed by the lce. Villtekil 'J'r#o is the Rummian naval officer who dimcoverd Niclls1 Il Land Srt~oat in 1913. The northeast passage as the voyage around Elght huadred, Siberia is called, uas made once before when the Noregan piss ort navigator, Nordenskjold, accomplishea it; thit\u003er-mix years drilli a the tec ago, by ailing in the opposite direction, but he was obliged Normalf Schoci to pend a winter in the Arctic ice before he reached the MCIÉFpe, toml Pacific. oPikdrn TeFrench have odqced the Greck iuand.of Corfu, becaume *'~~ oftelocation there of an Austro-Grma submarine base. bk-, Go%90 ,'ý A second base wuslodted la the narrow chaudl htwoeu We1sbp00L (:m that island and the Albanian coast, andmout oftilhe uubi rei3g4Qe@sé 1 raids in the Mediterranean had been diredted fromtthémé two Me L, bases. Corfu is nov being used as je place of refuge for oeiioi sa\" - c Siberian soldiers. The German authoritiei protest that this mie$Heto occupation of Corfu, and the landing of the ame~the -or- Sn 1 Allies at Saloniki and on some of, the islandâ of the Aegeamn, .'j tu.M are violations of Greek neutrality which neutal 'nations M - ene - shquld condemn as much'as they condedia the Gern ~ Ç invasion of Belgium. 1 t may be iememberbd tiat the j j 2 independence of the Kingdom of Greece, vhen irst estab- LBI lished,. us not to be absolute and'uncondiloned, but was to be guaranteed by Britain, France ind Russie..ý Apsrt froe m that protection, in theory ar voll as in fact, Greece today 0 would noi be independent. WSk.C I Continued figbting la, the trenches z France and Ylaa*rs'The.oùo b~as made littie apparent change in the. situation. -The noedto bu Rusians have muade advances la. Gaicil, and the It4loqs »h. have held their ground on theAustrien frOntier. la Mesopo- Mm i I tamis, the British, now comniandedbW Sir Pery Laie, held et the 1 have been held bock by weather- condiions, aud..bavê et \u003c yet sucçpýed larelieving the garrmop at Kutl-ASSP a In the Caucasus region the. Ruian bave bem ie sICCÇU5- fro February fui, and it is believedthat theY bave captured the important city of Erzeum, vhick vould be the grea1e0t té that th Turks have yet sustalned. The last of the Gerian rmies la tii. CaipetrOnbus bOes wh ses,\u0026W driven into Spsnimh teritorY, where. the-troo1Ps areMW5dt mt~ei have been diarmed and interdaed. la EsM ridca theo etm h»icat;ý tell of British gains. p ical coi The coponatioua of Yua Shih-kai as EMP«« Of iP*h bas mc u beeat deferred, becaume of the rebellion in tliA .outbm n »v- for the . ië mnes; but the Iatet rePpots eenM to show that t4a rO*b tnup.** have met vith a erifuq defeat. ýolkj In Mexico# the State of Oaxaca buasdeclared iIca4ton~$~, N . ence of the coàtrol goverment, natil sucli tism a rdu, à *PNi0I restored ila the -rep ùblie, Carrania bas\"aandeseOW, Mecb\u003e a -ltihmrtj City as the capital-of the couMty* -d' bas NWS uitM cist P . hi.i present headquer, thme proVîiional cPitaL",
         "EDUCATIONAL REVIEW. 1%4 Arts in King's CollegeP, Windsor, last May. During his cou rse he won the Governor General's medal and ev'ery available ucholarship and prize. He is now taking his divinity course and is a classical lecturer at King's, and instructor ia the officers' training course at Windsor. He volunteéred for overseas service last August, but was given permission to continue his work at Windsor as instructor i training courses. In connection with bis studies at Oxford he is extended the usual war priviteges. Rev. H. T. Stannage Boyle, of the staff of Trinity College, Toronto, bas been elected president of Kiag's Coliege in succession to Canon Powétl. Dr. Boyle was educated at Trlnity College, Toronto, and the Moatreal Diocesan Theological College, Ia 1898 he graduated with honorei Classics at Trinity, and i 1901 proceeded to his M. A.degree. He took his B.D. in904 andD. D. i 1910, and therefore cornes' to the college welt equipped i theological scholarship and able to strengthea the divinity facuIty. Upon bis ordination he was for a year curate at Shawville i the Diocese of Quebec, and sub- uequently curate for four years at the Cathedral, Montreal. In 1905 he became rector of Wingham, Ontario, and after three years rector of Chatham in the same Diocese. Two years later lie was appointed Professor of Church History and Litu8rgies at Trinity, wbere he subsequeatly became Dean -.of the Divinity School. Professor L. A. DeWolfe, director of Rual Science in Nova Scotia, ia the Truro News of January 2th, gives an encouraging report of the progress of Rural Science in that province. Gardens and exhibitions of garden pro- ducts grown by school cbildren have now become, Pro- fessr DeWolfe says, a permanent part of echoot work. In the summer of 1914 seven bundred children made gardens at borne, and seventy schools exhibited their produoe. In 1915 nearly two thousand children had gardens, and one hundred and sixty schools either beld exhibtions or sent exchibits to neighboring centres..... This work is voluatary and is carried on with eathusiasm and energy. _ __ _ _ PROBLEMS. Let the teacher try this exercise.' The pupils take pencil and paper and write numbers from. 1 to 10 inclusive, one on a line. Then the teacher gives'the problems one at a ie orally, the pupil solves mentally and writes resuit on paper. The work should be done rapidly. 1. There were 30 pupils in a school. 163 c% were absent.. How many w ere absent? 2. A ýteacher's salary was increased fromn $50 a month to $60. Find increase per cent. 3. A housekeeper bought 2 dozen oranges and 3 oranges were rotten. What % were rotten? 4. Thé, population of a town was 5,000 and in five years increased 20%. What was the population at end of the five years? 5. A man sold an automobile for $800 which was 33%' of what lie bad paid for it two years before. What did it cost him? 6. John weighs 84 pounds, and Henry weighs 8 % more. What is Hcnry's weight? 7. A basketball team won 6 games out of 10. What per cent were won? 8. A cletk paid $6 a week for room and board and this was 50%y, of his weekly salary. What was his salary? 9. A man buys a farm for $10,000 and selis it at an increase of 25%/. What was the selling price? 10. A boy spelled 40 words correctly in a spelling test of 50 words. What % did he miss? -School News RECENT BOOKS. How to Sludy and Whai go Study, by Richard L. Sand- wick,ýîgs\"a book which will be welcomed by teachers who wish to direct their pupils bow to use their opportunities and energies to the best advantage. It is the' wrter's belief that \" students have a right to as much and as expert coaching on how to study tessons from books as they receive on how to play football, how to dance, or how to do anything else, \" and in this belief he bas set forth simply the general principles of effective study. The first part of the book is given to these general pria- ciples. The second part is called \"Wbat to Study and How.\" It answers such questions as \"Why should we study Latin? What good will geometry ever be to us? Questions which every PIigh School teacher fis called upon to answer. Lastly, there are chapters devotèd1 to voca- tional studies, studies for the older professions, and an analysis of the qualities that make up efilciency. We strongly advise every teacher who wants to help his pupils to add this practical tittie book to his library. [D. C. Heath \u0026 Co., Boston. 175 pages, 60 cents.] Pioneer Life Among *h Loyal' ss in Upp\u003ee Canada,- by W. S. Herrington, K. C., is an interesting littie book giving vivid pictures of Me in Ontario a hundred years ago. Many of the conditions were like thome in the eastern provinces, such as we have beard of from our eiders, and some of the chapters might well be used as starting points for studies in local bistory. Others, as that on \"Early Courts and Electiond- offer comparisons in the 'study of civics. The illustrations add mucb to the interest of the book. [The MacMillan Company of Canada. 107 pages, 60 cents.] Nearly 'ail children love stories of animals, but so many have been written that are spoiled by inaccuracy and false sentiment that one has to be careful in choosing them. We can heartily 'recommend \"The Wonders of L1w Jungle, by Prince Sarath Ghosb. Written for slip- plementary reading in the earlier grades, it hia teresting to grown-ups as well. The jungle animais written of a4re the elephant, buffalo, antelope and bear. There are also- chapters on the 'carnet and on brigbt birds. The whole'",
         "b ook is written in a most entertaining style and conveys much information. It is well illustrated. [D. C. H.ath \u0026 Co.] We have already recommended Black's Histor Pi\u0026Wors, and those teacherp who are using them will b. glad to hear of the appearanoe of a St on The Midd). Agis. This set is particularly rich in architectural pictures. In ail there are ninety illustrations, with the usual ques- *iW n 6 tions and suggestions for use in connection with -the history lessons. '[A. \u0026 C. Black, Soho Square, Lon\"o. 10 pence the- net.] LOOK IT UP IN HEATON. The twelfth. edition of Heaton's AnnualCAI published by - Heaton's Agency, Toronto, ha* just appeared. There hms this year bees de- I veloped a section aptly ,entitled, \"-Where te HAVE find it. \" This is practically an index to thte more important contents of the Dominion and Provincial Govertiment Reports and standar publications relating to Canada and i. of much, value to teathers. Every business mmsa Md every wide-awake teacher some time' inithe . year says. to'himself \"Where -cm 1 find it,\" ùM t and often spends days- to find- ont ýOn the other band the Domini*on and Provincial Gov- ernments annually spend hundreds of thouein\u0026s of dollars in burying information afive ii bbOW and pamphlets, of, which the general public ýM neyer hear.. Indeed very few people know ýof ___ the valuable and interesting information whlc4 =S can be had for the adking. By referrlng to this i section the reader can at once Put bis fig.« upon the information whidl hewat and ffl \u0026 the publications -whkh contain itt anid the . CA department to whom application must b. made. As in preious years -the ziuIOt* official, baiko, insuance, and Legal Directorius, Postal la!orniatioût Cable Rate,.tbe, coepIete ,f Customs Taiff. revisedi to date;. a sbitpers good'4t guide (covering \u003e very commercial towanieaI Canada and glvig 'ti. po uta 1%Y*Y s k1 0t# ë- and ,Baniks), liat, of '.registry offces for dei th dan ai chattel mortgages, etc., UP-.edate descriPllQaw interept, of every Town' I CAna, Exchaaa an d and aLc m iscetianeous Tables, and' a mass of vatti*b4e tW 1 General Information#'froîn which crose tef«S- ialcff ences are given to the soeton, \"Where Io FIu4eý,aML it \" for the teaefit of #moe who want fiwh at i i information, It would be difficult to nimsg[,e a oflf book which fil,.its mission more c mpl - _ than- HeatoWs AùWaÙl.,",
         "* p~ EDUCATIONAL REVIEW *New Bi4nàwIlok So'hool ý-CaIênda 1915-1916 1916. SzcoND TR. Apr. 2th.-Schools close for Ester Vacation. Apr. 26th.-Schools re-open after Eas- ter Vacation. May l\"8th.-LoyalWs Day (Holiday for St. John City only). May May 23rd.-Empire Day. 23rd.-Examinations for Clans III License begin. May 24th.-V-;%ictoria Day (Publie I-oli- May day). 24th.-Last day on which Inspec- tors are authorized to re- ceive applications for Departmental Examina- tions. Reg. 38-6. june 5th.-King's Birthday, observedi (Public Holiday). june 9t.-Normal' School -Clo\"ig. * June l3th.-Final xmiaiosfor Ucense begila june i9th.-High School Entrance Ex. aminations begin. June 3th.-Pùblic Schools clos for the term. Our, New Catalogue CootaipaTuitionRates ancifa ifor- matu usp~tinLoreS of study. etc,. Sumd fSr a «Wp today. ?foqboter time forçentering than just ImmW. S. KERR, Principa. 1DIÂNONKDS \u0026 OPÂLS GOMd Maire, Bracoiet4 Goodeata A. \u0026 J. lÂY'S, 76 King Street St. Johi. N. Ba. SUBSCRIBE NOW FOR THEr Educational Review, Homes Sanitary and Beautiful CHURCH'S Cold Water ALABASTINE torme as Mmel e»B omtl.gfor, mot oidy la Il doUshtful 10the oye, but., k la Naturl A.ts.ptic, gen thewalls a chance to 'btm,\" kmmihg 1k ab swoet and pur.e herever t la »e\u0026d SOLO IN PACKAGES a 1-2 POUND$ 25 CENT$ W, Hi THORNE \u0026 COu, Ltdif a PouNOS 56\u003e CENTS Maiket Squar. and King St. ST. JOHN, N. B. Public, Schools and Sunday SchoolLibraries WE HAVEý A VERY LARGE ASSORTMENT 0F BOOKS SUITABLE FOR LIBRARIES which we are off ering at very low prices.. SEND FOR LISTS. BOOKS SENT ON APPROVAL. E. G.. NELSON \u0026 CO., ESTABUSHED 1804 Your eyes ar e -ntitled to the best you CAR give them. W. are modernly equipped to test your eyes ad fit you with the proper glams and ab\"outely guarante. them. D. BOYANER TWO STORES 38 DOCK ST. 111 CHARLOTTE ST. ST. JO0H N, N.U3. 56 KING STRIEET, ST. JOHN. N. B. BIENFAIT, - SASK. Note the. NEW SANITARY STANDARDS 0F THE PRESTON DESK It is the most important innovatiôn of recent years in connection with school desks, and does away with the fancy dust-catching and unsanitary standards of the old style. It places the Preston Desk on an equality with any sanitary school desk made, with the added advantage of con- siderable lower price. And mari thIa-you are sot aakcd to pay an extra cent for thia peut Improvement. TU.E-GEI. M..HENDRY CO., LIIMTER, 215-219 VICTORIA STREET. .Ehcami Write us Otdm yotir re- quireumetu. MOdwe lt quottm.m SOLE AGENTS FOR EASTERIN CANADA 196 iMr. Married School Tecè Your vacation, plus a small investmnent. will mùore than double your income. No canvassing. Interested? Write Box No. 10 One Dollar a Year. TORONTO. ONT. 1"
      ],
